JAPAN:     Economic Trends -- FEATURE: Report Assesses Consumer 
Impact of Government Regulations;  MOF Makes It Easier for Consumers 
To Monitor Prices of Imported Goods 

   Environmental Issues: STA To Begin Underwater Cable Project To 
Track Seismic Activity; KEPCO, TEPCO To Provide Environmental Know- 
how To India 

   Financial Issues: FEATURE: Japanese Banks Have 'Asia Fever'; 
FEATURE: Housing Lenders' Delinquencies Threaten Financial System 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  CHINA:  Secom Forms Security 
Services Joint Venture in Dalian 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Police Raid Firms Suspected of Illegal 
Exports 

   Machine Tools/Robotics:  MT Association Committee To Study 
Industry Reorganization; Yamazaki Mazak To Quadruple Its MT Product 
Line; Mori Seiki Strengthening Presence in Europe; Toyoda Machine 
Works Halts MT Production in U.S.; Tsugami To Shift MT Parts 
Production to Subsidiaries; Dijet Industrial Downgrades 43 Executive 
Positions; November MT Sales Fell 27.2 Percent, Remain at Low Level 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics:  NEC To Mass Produce Logic 
Semiconductors With 0.35 Micron Geometries; Fujitsu Attempting To 
Seize Lead in Logic Chip Production; Imports of South Korean 
Semiconductors Surge 

   Telecommunications/Satellites: NEC To Shift Production of SONET 
System Equipment to U.S.; NEC, Fujitsu Target U.S. Market For ATM 
Switching Equipment; Sanyo, Northern Telecom To Market Multimedia 
Products in Canada 

   CHINA: Domestic Developments -- Twenty State Enterprises To List 
on Hong Kong Bourse in 1994; Shanghai's Private Economy Outstrips 
Overall Economy; Registered Company Start-Ups in Shanghai Increase 
153 Percent; CElTIC To Move Gold, Foreign Currency Focus to 
Shanghai; Hunan Launches 23 High-Tech Projects in 1993; Growth in 
Individual, Private Economic Sectors in Yunnan Reported 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  Japanese Rank First Among Foreign 
Investors in Hong Kong; Capital Steel Seeks Hong Kong Funding for 
Shandong Plant; Hong Kong-Based Firm Invests in Guangzhou Steel 
Mill; Burmah Castrol, Shenzhen Jinke To Establish Joint Venture; UK 
Firm To Establish Video-Conferencing Facilities in Hubei; Swiss 
Pharmaceutical Firm Plans $30 Million Factory in Shanghai; Shandong 
Approval of Taiwan-Invested Projects Up 180 Percent in 1993 
   Taiwan:  Lowest Trade Surplus in 10 Years Reported; Procedures 
for Foreign Investment To Be Simplified; Survey Shows Over 30 
Countries Impose Trade Barriers on Taiwan; Labor Productivity Growth 
Expected To Show Decline for 1993; Minister on World Economic Blocs, 
Future Trade Focus; Cross-Strait Trade Expected To Total $20 Billion 
in 1994; Company To Examine Tenders for Nuclear Power Plant No. 4; 
Relief Measures Drafted To Help Industries Hit by Imported Goods; 
Export Growth, Industrial Output Projections Reported; Export 
Exchange Earnings for December Reach Record High 

   NORTH KOREA:  Light Industry To Focus on Production, Quality 
Control Goals 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Business Plans of Major Conglomerates for 
1994 Highlighted; FEATURE:  S and T 1994 Budget, S and T 
Accomplishments for 1993 Reported; FEATURE:  Record Sales, Profits 
Reported for Electronics in 1993; FEATURE:  Intelligence Agency 
Emphasizing Industrial Espionage; FEATURE: Press View Developments 
in ROK-Vietnam Trade; Research Institutes Raise 1994 Growth Rate 
Estimates; Rail Car Orders Expected To Drop 34.5 Percent in 1994; 
ROK To Switch to Metric System for Measuring Rice, Barley; New 
Center To Promote Design, Manufacture of ASIC's; Ministries Funding 
Development of 256M DRAM; Daewoo To Establish Aviation Technology 
Research Center in Russia; Euro-Asia Business Center To Be 
Established in Amsterdam; Daewoo To Invest in Auto Joint Venture in 
Romania; Kia To Assemble Cars in Pakistan; Hyundai Motors To 
Manufacture Cars in Egypt; Samsung To Build TV Parts Plant in 
Mexico; HalIa Group To Export Cement Plant to Papua New Guinea 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA -- Minister Comments on Unemployment 
Rate; Economist Estimates 5.7-Percent Growth for 1994; Habibie 
Seeking Consortium To Produce 'People's Car'; Companies Interested 
in Setting Up Telecommunication Network; ADB Approves Loan for 
Eastern Islands 

   MALAYSIA: High-Technology Cooperation With Indonesia Planned 

   PHILIPPINES:  Brownouts in Manila To Continue in 1994 

   THAILAND: Government Approves Financial Liberalization for 
Offshore Banking; New Measures To Promote Greater Capital Outflow; 
Lower Tariffs Approved for Nonferrous Metal Products, Devices 

   VIETNAM:  Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in 1993 Listed; 
Investor Countries in 1993 Reported; Auto Assembly Venture With 
Daewoo Licensed; Workers at Foreign-Invested Firms Reportedly 
Underpaid; Foreign Firms Plan To Manufacture, Assemble Cars in 
Vietnam; Increase in 1993 Foreign Investments Reported; Ship Repair 
Joint Venture Established; Foreign Investment in Dong Nai Province 
Reported; Taiwanese, French Firms To Help Build Refinery; Increase 
in Ho Chi Minh City Private Sector Output Reported; Hanoi Industrial 
Sector Marks 22.7-Percent Increase; Bank of Commerce and Industry 
Begins New Service; Shipping Firm Signs Contracts With Japan, ROK; 
Construction Begins on Joint Venture Hotel; 'Cost-and- Freight' 
Crude Oil Export Noted; Power Supply for Southern Provinces 
Increases; Three Foreign Investment Projects Approved 

   Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-02) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends -- FEATURE:  Report Assesses Consumer 
Impact of Government Regulations -- SUMMARY:  According to a report 
written by the Daiwa Research Institute (DRI), prices in Japan for 
public utilities, transportation, food, and gasoline--all industries 
protected by government regulations--are much higher than prices in 
the United States, while the prices of automobiles and electrical 
machinery--industries which are not regulated--are roughly 
comparable or lower.  The report urges deregulation to eliminate 
price differences and to realize Japan's full growth potential. 
Also, in an article published on 24 December, Seiji Shimpo, a 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) economist, urges deregulation so that 
Japan can harmonize its economy with the world economy "if it is to 
survive." 

   To analyze the difference between Japanese and U.S. consumer 
prices, the DRI surveyed the prices of 23 items in various 
industrial categories in both countries between August and November 
1993, according to a DRI report published in the 18 December issue 
of SHUKAN TOYO KEIZAI, a leading business weekly.  At an exchange 
rate of 107 yen to the dollar, Japanese prices are from 1.1 to 2.0 
times higher than U.S. prices.  Even using the 1992 OECD purchasing 
power rate of 190 yen to the dollar, Japanese prices are 0.6 to 1.5 
times higher than U.S  prices. 

   Based on the survey, the DRI calculated "parity exchange rates" 
for each of the 23 items.  They range from 1,180 yen to $1 for 
wheat, 700 yen per $1 for gasoline, 540 yen for butter, 290 yen for 
long-distance telephone calls and electricity, 135 yen for 
automobiles, 120 yen for audio-visual equipment, and 50 yen for 
pharmaceutical products sold to hospitals. 

   Big Price Disparities Due to Productivity Differences -- The DRI 
report points out that price differences among Japanese goods and 
services caused by differences in productivity are "far greater" 
than differences between foreign and domestic prices, which are 
mainly caused by a "strong yen that does not reflect actual 
purchasing power."  Those items whose Japanese prices are higher 
than U.S. prices, based on either the current yen to dollar rate 
(107:1) or the OECD's 190:1 rate, or the purchasing power rate 
are foodstuffs, petroleum products, public utilities, housing, 
apparel, and polyethylene, products which are for the most part are 
regulated by the government and "whose productivity is low." 

   In the case of automobiles, audio-visual equipment, ethylene, 
steel, copper, high-quality paper, and oil tankers, whose production 
is not regulated by the government and which are manufactured in 
highly productive processes, Japanese prices are still slightly 
higher based on the current exchange rate, but would be lower based 
on a purchasing power rate. 

   According to the report, pharmaceutical products sold to 
hospitals are the only items whose prices are "remarkably" lower 
based on either the current or purchasing power rate.  The report 
notes, however, that since Japanese doctors and hospitals tend to 
prescribe "excessive quantities" of drugs, consumers end up paying 
much money for drugs. 

   Prices Remain High Even Though Yen Has Appreciated -- Concerning 
manufactured and processed goods other than dairy products, 
textiles, color television sets, and semiconductors, domestic prices 
have not come down even though the yen started appreciating in 1985. 
The primary reason, according to the DRI report, is that Japanese 
imports have not increased sufficiently to cause domestic prices to 
drop.  The report explains that government regulations, standards 
and certification systems, and a variety of Japanese business 
practices work to prevent foreign products, whose prices have 
dropped due to the strong yen, "from gaining market share in Japan." 
The report argues that because of such barriers, the "commonly 
understood logic" that yen appreciation will lead to increased 
imports, which in turn will promote competition in the Japanese 
market, increase Japanese productivity, and lower prices, "does not 
work in Japan." 

   Concerning services, such as public utilities, distribution, and 
personal services, the report adds that Japanese prices have 
remained basically the same regardless of the exchange rate, because 
the exchange rate does not affect "competitive conditions" in these 
industries. 

   Deregulation Urged To Realize Full Growth Potential -- The report 
urges deregulation measures be adopted by the government to raise 
productivity in protected industries and eliminate price 
differences.  The report claims that the automobile and electronics 
industries, which have led Japan's exports and contributed to its 
economic growth, are not regulated and therefore have achieved high 
productivity and international competitiveness in the face of 
"severe competition."  In the public utilities, communications, 
food, and petroleum industries, on the other hand, protection by 
government regulations has kept both productivity and 
competitiveness low. 

   The DRI concludes that when the government deregulates the 
protected industries to raise their productivity to U.S. levels, 
Japan's gross domestic product (GDP) would be 10 percent, or 45 
trillion yen ($421 billion), higher than if no deregulation occurs 
in the next 10 years.  It also notes that when productivity is 
raised by deregulation, approximately 6.4 million workers, or about 
10 percent of the total labor force, will become "surplus." 

   MOF Economist Urges Deregulation To Help Japan's Economic 
Recovery -- In an article published in the 24 December NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Seiji Shimpo, deputy director of Ministry of 
Finance's (MOF) Institute of Fiscal and Monetary Policy, argues that 
Japan should implement deregulation for two basic reasons: 1) 
Japan's system must be "compatible" with those of other 
industrialized countries; and 2) Japan needs to expand opportunities 
for new businesses "to escape the current recession."  Shimpo notes 
that contrary to the international trend toward deregulation 
following the collapse of the planned economies, "the number of 
regulations has been increasing in Japan."  In 1987, for example, 
40.1 percent of Japan's gross domestic product (GDP) was produced by 
industries that are "regulated to some extent," and 21.8 percent of 
GDP was produced by industries that are "tightly regulated."  In 
1989, these percentages increased to 40.8 percent and 24.1 percent 
respectively. 

   In addition to intense lobbying by interest groups, Shimpo points 
out that the value Japanese place on "coexistence" and "harmony" is 
an obstacle to deregulation.  Shimpo rejects the Federation of 
Economic Organizations' (Keidanren) policy of "coexistence" (kyosei) 
by asking why consumers want "inefficient firms" and "incompetent 
managers" to coexist.  Shimpo notes that the government, Keidanren, 
and even the media have a perception that government guidance and 
the observance of guidance by industry are "ethical."  In the same 
vein, "order" and "mutual assistance" among companies in an industry 
are "virtues."  Shimpo asserts that all this contradicts the 
principle of competition upon which market capitalism is founded. 
The Japanese people should remember, he observes, that the basic 
factor generating economic development in Japan has been "market 
competition," not government regulation. 

   Shimpo is critical of Japan's media for tending to report 
economic issues in a manner that appeals to the "heart" rather than 
the "mind" of readers.  This helps "the so-called revisionists in 
the United States" justify their calls for discrimination against 
Japan in international trade by highlighting "alleged differences" 
between Japan and the other industrialized nations.  Shimpo asserts 
that it is Japan's responsibility "to prove that the revisionists 
are wrong" by reforming Japan's economic society. 
   In conclusion, Shimpo restates his view that deregulation is an 
"unavoidable step in harmonizing the Japanese economy with the world 
economy, from which Japan cannot be isolated if it is to survive." 
He urges politicians to "institutionalize the economic logic and 
analyses of deregulation" that have been recommended by economists. 

   MOF Makes It Easier for Consumers To Monitor Prices of Imported 
Goods -- As part of the Hosokawa cabinet's policy of sharing the 
benefits of the current strong yen with consumers, the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) published in the November issue of FINANCE, the 
ministry's monthly journal, a report on the custom clearance prices 
of "30 consumer products" imported in September 1993.  The MOF 
selected 30 consumer goods which it considers of "the highest 
interest" to consumers and, for the first time, published their 
prices separately from the detailed custom clearance data appearing 
in its monthly trade statistics. 

   According to the report, the import prices for 25 of the 30 
products dropped compared to September 1992, ranging from a 43- 
percent drop in the price of bananas, a 38.7-percent decline in the 
price of Italian dress shirts, a 5.6-percent drop for U.S. 
cigarettes, and a 4.5-percent drop for Scotch whisky.  The weighted 
average of the 30 custom clearance prices dropped 14.8 percent 
compared to September 1992.  The report concludes that the primary 
cause for the drop in import prices is the appreciation of the yen, 
which has appreciated by 16.1 percent, from 124 yen per dollar in 
September 1992 to 104 in September 1993.  The report notes that some 
of the goods were paid for in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. 
For example, English tea was priced in British pounds, which 
depreciated about 30 percent against the yen, and Italian dress 
shirts were priced in Italian lira, which depreciated about 42 
percent against the yen.  Some goods were contracted for in yen, 
such as frozen tuna, American beer and cigarettes, and German 
automobiles, and their import prices "were not affected by the 
foreign exchange rate." 

   The MOF report also contains Tokyo retail prices compiled by the 
Economic Planning Agency (EPA) as of October 1993 for 20 of the 30 
imported consumer goods.  The MOF claims that by comparing retail 
prices continuously, everyone will see the extent to which the 
benefits of a strong yen are distributed.  The MOF urges consumers 
to "strictly monitor" trends in import and retail prices. 

   According to the EPA data contained in the MOF report, the Tokyo 
retail prices of the 20 imported products "rarely reflect" the 
decreases in import prices.  For example, the custom clearance price 
of Italian spaghetti dropped 35.7 percent, while the retail price 
dropped only 4.1 percent, and the custom clearance price of U.S. 
golf balls dropped 10.3 percent, but the retail price rose 1.0 
percent.  Of 16 imported consumer goods whose custom clearance 
prices had fallen, the retail prices of 13 goods dropped; two (U.S. 
beer and U.S. cigarettes) remained the same; and one (U.S. golf 
balls) rose.  Of the four products whose custom clearance prices had 
risen, the retail prices of two (oranges and tennis rackets) 
dropped, while two (EC-made electric shavers and lemons) rose. 

   Environmental Issues:  STA To Begin Underwater Cable Project To 
Track Seismic Activity -- The Science and Technology Agency (STA) 
this year will begin a 10-year project to lay an underwater fiber 
optic cable, fitted with seismometers, around the Japanese 
archipelago as part of a comprehensive marine environmental 
observation network to track and monitor undersea seismic activity. 
Basically the STA will use the fiber optic network in place of 
observation vessels and submarines to detect earthquakes and tidal 
waves and to provide timely, detailed information on their scale and 
potential impact.  The STA also hopes to attach other sensors to the 
fiber optic cable to measure underwater temperatures, ocean 
currents, and earth plate and volcanic activity, as well as to 
collect data on the levels of carbon dioxide in sea water for 
research on global warming.  The research results gained from the 
project will also be used to develop technology for using the 
optical fiber itself as a type of thermometer. 

   Twenty public and private enterprises will participate in the STA 
project, including research organizations of the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry and the Ministry of Transport, 
Tokyo University, NEC, Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, and Oki Electric 
Industry.  The STA will spend the first five years of the project 
developing the basic technology related to the seismometers and 
developing methods to transmit the data.  Then the agency will begin 
laying the fiber optic cable off the Japanese islands and later at 
deeper levels, closer to submarine trenches.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 1) 

   KEPCO, TEPCO To Provide Environmental Know-how To India -- Kansai 
Electric Power Co. (KEPCO) and Tokyo Electric Power Co. (TEPCO) will 
provide environmental technology and know-how to the nine thermal 
power plants in India with a total generating capacity of 18.2 
million kilowatts. The two companies will work with the public 
thermal power companies which manage the plants as part of an 
agreement reached at a 1992 meeting of power company executives from 
throughout the world. 

   KEPCO will transfer its environmental technology and plant 
management know-how to control sulfur oxide and nitrogen oxide 
emissions.  TEPCO will provide guidance on improving the fuel 
efficiency of boilers to reduce the amount of coal consumed, and 
also will instruct the companies on reducing and controlling the 
volume of gas emissions from their thermal power plants.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 11) 

   Financial Issues:  FEATURE:  Japanese Banks Have 'Asia Fever' -- 
SUMMARY:  According to the Japanese press, Japanese banks are making 
a special effort to penetrate financial markets in Thailand, 
Malaysia, and China. 

   The 7 December MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that presently there are 
18 Japanese banks in Thailand, including six that opened branches in 
Bangkok in 1993--Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ), Long-Term Credit 
Bank of Japan (LTCB), Sumitomo Bank, Mitsubishi Bank, Dai-Ichi 
Kangyo Bank (DKB), and Sanwa Bank--and two that established 
representative offices there in 1993, Bank of Fukuoka and Sumitomo 
Trust Bank.  The banks are reportedly responding to the Thai 
government's financial liberalization policy and promotion of 
offshore markets.  According to one Japanese branch manager in 
Thailand, "the rate of profit at Thai branches is first or second 
among our branches worldwide."  The banks say that their objective 
in going into Thailand is to supply Japanese companies with funds to 
expand their operations there. 

   Meanwhile in Malaysia, according to the MAINICHI, Japanese banks 
are participating in creating an international financial center 
(kokusai kinyu center) on Labuan Island, an offshore market located 
in the north of Borneo.  DKB and Sanwa opened branches there in 
November 1993 while IBJ and Sakura were scheduled to follow suit in 
December. 

   In addition, the 17 January NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN reports that the 
Singapore branches of DKB, Sumitomo, Tokai Bank, and IBJ have 
formally agreed to provide $250 million to the Malaysia Highway 
Authority (Malaysia Kosokudorocho) in cooperation with two Malaysian 
commercial banks.  The loan will be registered in an account in the 
Labuan market.  The Malaysian government has been promoting the 
Labuan market for the past few years, but by year-end 1992 its 
outstanding transaction balance was only $1 billion. The recent loan 
by the Japanese banks is the largest since they began entering that 
market in the spring of 1993.  Malaysia expects the Japanese banks 
to be the driving force behind the growth of the Labuan market. 

   Banks Financing Hong Kong Real Estate Development -- Major 
commercial and long-term credit banks are stepping up real-estate- 
related financing in Hong Kong, according to the 3 January NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  In September 1993, the Bank of Tokyo, 
Fuji, Sanwa, Sumitomo and LTCB syndicated a loan amounting to 
HK$2.65 billion (roughly $343.3 million) to Cheung Kong (Holdings) 
Ltd., a large Hong Kong real estate developer.  In addition, 
Mitsubishi Bank and Sumitomo, among others,  provided funding to Sun 
Hung Kai Properties, another major real estate developer, when it 
raised HK$900 million (roughly $116.8 million) to renovate office 
buildings. 

   According to NIKKEI, in Hong Kong, which is considered the 
gateway to investment in China, the demand for office buildings and 
housing continues to grow while prices continue to rise.  Hong 
Kong's large corporations rely largely on Japanese banks for 
financing in the competitive real-estate development market. 

   MOF Appeals to Chinese Government on Behalf of Japanese Banks -- 
The Ministry of Finance (MOF) is reportedly asking the Chinese 
government to allow Japanese banks to deal in the Chinese yuan. 
According to the 15 January NIKKEI, currently, it does not allow 
foreign banks to deal in yuan. Thus, Japanese banks can only make 
loans and conduct foreign exchange in dollars or yen, while Japanese 
companies in China, as a result of a revision in the foreign 
exchange system on 1 January, are prohibited from holding or using 
anything but the yuan.  Consequently, Japanese banks cannot satisfy 
the need of Japanese companies for interim operational funds. 

   NIKKEI reports, by the end of 1993, 10 Japanese banks had opened 
17 branches and 54 representative offices in China in response to 
the government's reform and liberalization policy begun in the late 
l97Os.  But foreign banks are concerned that the recent revision of 
China's foreign exchange system will be a major hindrance to their 
business there.  Upon appeals from the banks, MOP has "unofficially" 
started working on getting authorization from the Chinese government 
for the banks to deal in yuan. MOF's goal is not only to promote 
penetration by Japanese banks into the Chinese market but also 
indirectly to assist Japanese companies to invest there. 

   FEATURE:  Housing Lenders' Delinquencies Threaten Financial 
System -- SUMMARY:  Japan's housing loan corporations continue to 
pose a major threat to the stability of the financial system, 
according to press reports. Although virtually all of these 
corporations implemented restructuring plans in the spring of 1993, 
because of the sluggish real estate market and the erosion of their 
traditional lending market by other banks and the government-run 
Housing Loan Corporation (HLC), the housing lenders are reportedly 
straining the major financial institutions that founded them. 

   A total of eight housing loan corporations were established 
jointly by banks, securities firms, and insurance companies between 
1971 and 1979 in conjunction with the government's policy to improve 
housing opportunities, according to the 15 March KINYU ZAISEI JIJO, 
a financial weekly.  There is also a government-run housing lender, 
the HLC, which is under the joint jurisdiction of the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) and the Ministry of Construction (MOC).  The eight 
corporations and their parent companies are as follows: 


Housing Lender        Founded  Founding Parent Institutions 
Nippon Housing Loan    1971  Nine commercial, trust, and regional 
   Co.                          banks, including Sanwa, Sakura, and 
                                Daiwa 
Juso Inc.              1971  Seven trust banks 
Housing Loan Service   1971  Seven commercial banks 
   Co. 
Sogo Jukin Co.         1972  Second-tier regional banks 
Dai-Ichi Housing       1975  LTCB and Nomura Securities, among 
others 
   Loan Co. 
Chigin-Seiho Housing   1976  First-tier regional banks, insurance 
   Loan Co.                     firms 
Japan Housing Loan     1976  IBJ, Nippon Credit Bank 
   Inc. 
Kyodo-Jutaku Loan      1979  Central Bank for Agriculture and 
                                Forestry 



   During the 1970s, the private housing lenders experienced double- 
digit growth, both in terms of the number and total amount of loans 
extended.  In the l98Os however, their position gave way to the 
banks and the HLC, which gradually assumed larger portions of their 
traditional home mortgage market, according to the 5 July 1993 
NIKKEI BUSINESS.  Subsidized by the national treasury, the HLC can 
lend at rates nearly 3 percent lower than those charged by the 
private housing lenders.  In addition, its requirements ensure that 
it makes only "relatively good loans," prompting charges from the 
private lenders that the HLC "grabs only the best."  As of FY92, the 
HLC's share of new housing loans was 32.9 percent.  The 29 December 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reports that new lending by the HLC in the 
second quarter of FY93 increased 13.8 percent over the previous 
quarter. 

   To compensate for their diminished market share, NIKKEI BUSINESS 
observes, the housing lenders began to finance commercial real 
estate deals.  A Bank of Japan executive reportedly states that "one 
reason the private housing lenders rushed into high-risk real estate 
lending is that choice properties were taken by the HLC."  But the 
number of bankrupt commercial borrowers is increasing, along with 
the amount of nonperforming loans. 

   Housing Lenders Are 'Dead,' Despite Restructuring -- According to 
the 28 December MAINICHI SHIMBUN, seven of the eight housing lenders 
(Kyodo Jutaku did not participate) conferred with the MOF and the 
financial community in the spring of 1993 over a 10-year 
restructuring plan led by their parent banks.  As of the end of 
March 1993, three of the eight companies--Chigin-Seiho, Sogo Jukin, 
and Juso--were insolvent.  According to the restructuring plan, the 
parent banks stopped charging interest on existing loans to the 
housing lenders, other financial institutions reduced their interest 
rates to 2.5 percent annually, and financial institutions affiliated 
with the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry (CBAF) reduced 
their loan interest rate to 4.5 percent annually. 

   In addition, MAINICHI reports, financial institutions extended 
about 150 billion yen ($1.364 billion) in new funding to the seven 
housing lenders during the first half of FY93 as part of this "life- 
support policy."  The outstanding balance of loans payable by the 
housing lenders totaled 12.86 trillion yen ($116.9 billion) as of 
the end of September 1993, broken down as follows (figures are in 
billions of yen--I billion yen equals $9.09 million--except the 
"Total" column, where the yen figures are in trillions and the 
dollar equivalents are in billions; LTCB denotes long-term credit 
banks): 


   Loans Owed by Housing Lenders as of September 1993 by Lending 
Sector --       Commercial LTCB  Trust CBAF-      Other     Totals 
               Banks            Banks  Affiliated Instit.(tr Y/$bil) 

Nippon 
Housing         694      281    167    892        304      2.34  $21 
Juso Inc.       70       121    903    777        148      2.02  $18 
Housing Loan 
 Service        391       89    151    861        193      1.69  $15 
Sogo Jukin Co.  31       176    126    735        338      1.41  $13 
Dai-Ichi 
 Housing        80       220    369    877        250      1.80  $16 
Chigin-Seiho    73        32     54    460        573      1.20  $11 
Japan Housing   113      543    336    993        422      2.41  $22 

Totals          1,454     1,463        2,107 5,597        2,236 
12.86 
$117 



   As part of the restructuring plan, it was agreed that the new 
loans to the housing lenders would not be classified as 
"nonperforming assets" in the banks' financial statements, according 
to MAINICHI SHIMBUN.    "Officially" the nonperforming assets of 
Japan's 21 major commercial, long-term credit, and trust banks 
totaled 13.75 trillion yen ($125 billion) as of the end of September 
1993, but if the roughly 5 trillion yen ($45.45 billion) in loans 
extended to the housing lenders are included in the banks' 
nonperforming loan total, the figure comes to almost 19 trillion yen 
($172 billion). 

   In addition, the 21 January 1994 CHUNICHI SHIMBUN reports that 
the September 1993 balance of nonperforming assets held by the seven 
housing lenders increased by about 630 billion yen ($5.727 billion), 
or 13 percent, during the first half of FY93.  Totaling 5.21 
trillion yen ($47.3 billion), the nonperforming loans constitute 46 
percent of the seven lenders' total loans receivable.  Nippon 
Housing holds the largest amount of nonperforming assets, about 1.1 
trillion yen ($10 billion), while another private lender, the 
Housing Loan Service, holds the greatest proportion of nonperforming 
assets to total loans receivable, at 65 percent. 

   Commenting on the restructuring plan, an executive of a major 
commercial bank states that "essentially the seven housing lenders 
are dead," despite the plan, according to the MAINICHI article. 

   Ultimately, the MOF envisions that the housing loan sector will 
shrink from the current eight housing loan corporations to two or 
three, according to the 8 January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The paper points 
out that many in the financial community view the original 
restructuring plan simply as a means to "postpone the issue" of 
dealing with the housing lenders.  The 12 December NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN reports that some sources in the financial community predict 
that the whole system of assistance to the housing lenders "will 
fall apart by March 1994, or at the latest, by September 1994." 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  CHINA -- Secom Forms Security 
Services Joint Venture in Dalian -- Secom Co., a major Japanese 
security services company, will begin a security-services business 
in Dalian in May.  Secom's holding company, Secom (China) Company 
Ltd., headquartered in Beijing, and the Dalian Huaxing Import-Export 
Company, a general trading company owned by the city of Dalian, have 
formed a joint venture (JV) company to provide online electronic 
security services to banks, factories, and office buildings in 
Dalian.  The JV will be capitalized at $2 million, with Secom 
(China) investing 80 percent and Dalian Huaxing 20 percent. 
The joint venture will connect customers with online sensors, 
which can detect and report intruders and equipment malfunctions, 
whereupon security personnel or engineers, on duty 24-hours a day, 
will be dispatched to check out the problem.  Secom expects the 
demand for this kind of service, which costs less than having 
security guards stationed at each site, to increase greatly in 
China.  Later it will extend this type of service to other cities 
with adequate telecommunications infrastructures, such as Beijing 
and Shanghai.  So far Secom and the general trading company Itochu 
are the only Japanese firms to have holding companies in China. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 10) 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Police Raid Firms Suspected of Illegal 
Exports -- SUMMARY:  According to the Japanese press, the Tokyo 
Metropolitan Police (TMP) raided the offices of several Japanese 
companies and the homes of company executives for suspected illegal 
exports of high-performance spectrum analyzers to North Korea in 
1989.  Export of these instruments is restricted under Coordinating 
Committee for Multilateral Export Controls (COCOM) rules and 
Japanese law.  Several papers speculate that the analyzers might 
have been used by North Korea to develop its "Nodong I" missile. 

   According to the 14 January evening editions of several Japanese 
newspapers, the TMP Public Security Department on 14 January raided 
several firms and their executives' homes concerning sale of the 
spectrum analyzers, whose export would be a violation of Japan's 
Foreign Exchange and Trade Control Law.  The TMP suspects that three 
high-performance spectrum analyzers manufactured by Anritsu 
Corporation, and which were on the COCOM restricted list, were 
exported to North Korea by Yokohama Machinery Trading Company via 
China in January and March 1989.  The firms searched by the TMP 
included Anritsu in Tokyo, and Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji 
Trading in Yokohama. 

   The 15 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, YOMIURI SHIMBUN, and NHK TV 
NEWS (which is in the Nikkei Telecom database) all report that the 
TMP suspects the three analyzers were exported to North Korea after 
being passed through various trading companies in Japan and via 
China to conceal the illegality of the transaction.  According to 
the papers, the three analyzers were sold for 3 million yen 
($27,300) each by Anritsu to a trading company in Tokyo specializing 
in trade with China, resold to another unidentified trading company, 
and then sold to Yokohama Machinery Trading.  Yokohama Machinery 
Trading is suspected of having exported the analyzers first to China 
and then to North Korea without proper documentation.  According to 
the papers, Anritsu claims that it warned the trading company in 
Tokyo that the analyzers were on the COCOM restricted list.  Anritsu 
has denied knowing they were diverted to North Korea. 

   Two Yokohama Firms Implicated in Diversion -- The 14 January 
YOMIURI SHIMBUN reports that Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji 
Trading are small companies in Yokohama with capital of 1 million 
yen ($9,090) each, with three or four employees.  Both companies are 
managed by the same president, Masahiko Kondo, and are located in 
the same building.  They export plastic molding machinery, used 
cars, and electrical machines exclusively to China, Vietnam, and 
North Korea.  YOMIURI reports that Yokohama Machinery Trading once 
had representative offices in North Korea and Beijing.  According to 
the 15 January SANKEI SHIMBUN, the TMP obtained documents revealing 
that employees of Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji Trading had 
traveled to North Korea via China several times in the past for 
"business negotiations." 

   Anritsu, the manufacturer of the spectrum analyzers, is a major 
testing and measurement equipment manufacturer headquartered in 
Tokyo.  According to the 14 January YOMIURI, Anritsu sells cable and 
radio communications equipment and measurement equipment to the 
Japan Defense Agency (JDA). 

   MITI Surprised, MOFA Not Concerned About U.S. Reaction -- 
According to the 14 January evening editions of SANKEI SHIMBUN and 
other Tokyo papers, the Export Division of the International Trade 
Bureau of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI), 
which administers COCOM-related issues, does not appear to have 
known about the case.  MITI officials were surprised by the news and 
were "busy in emergency meetings all day," SANKEI SHIMBUN reports. 
MITI Minister Hiroshi Kumagai said in a press conference on 14 
January that he had not been briefed, but instructed MITI officials 
to investigate the case and to come up with countermeasures as soon 
as possible. 

   According to the 15 January NHK TV NEWS, a source in the Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) commented that "unlike the Toshiba Machine 
Case of 1987, where Toshiba Machine exported advanced milling 
machines to the then Soviet Union and allegedly helped the Soviets 
improve their submarines," this case would "not directly threaten 
U.S. national security," and therefore "the United States had not 
reacted so much to the case." 

   JDA Concerned Over Suspected Use to Develop Missile -- The 14 
January evening edition of YOMIURI SHIMBUN and other papers comment 
that the spectrum analyzers illegally exported to North Korea in 
1989 "may have been used by North Korea to develop Nodong I 
missiles."  According to YOMIURI, defense sources are "gravely 
concerned" about the case, stating that Nodong I missiles would be a 
considerable threat to Japan, since all of Japan's territory would 
be within the range of Nodong missiles if they are deployed.  A JDA 
source commented to YOMIURI that "if the spectrum analyzers were 
used to develop the Nodong I, they must have been used to analyze 
engine vibrations and flight patterns." 

   Also according to the 14 January YOMIURI, the TMP Public Security 
Department commented that the analyzers would be effective devices 
to help develop "electrical parts of a control system for nuclear 
reactors." 

   Machine Tools/Robotics:  MT Association Committee To Study 
Industry Reorganization -- The Japan Machine Tool Builders' 
Association (JMTBA) has established an ad hoc committee to study the 
supply and demand situation in the machine tool (MT) industry.  Some 
industry observers believe the formation of the committee could 
initiate negotiations on "cooperation" within the industry.  The 
committee is expected to calculate an appropriate workforce size for 
the industry based on the supply and demand projections and 
production capacities of all companies.  Goro Tejima, chairman of 
the committee, who is also JMTBA chairman and president of Hitachi 
Seiki, observes:  "The MT industry is facing its biggest crisis 
since the end of the war.  Even now we are planning for orderly 
competition and cooperation."  Others in the industry believe that 
for a debate on reorganizing the industry to begin, "talks on 
cooperation by all industry colleagues must emerge through this 
committee." 

   The committee is to issue "guidelines" for the industry's medium- 
term prospects to the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) by the end of February 1994.  The MITI bureau responsible for 
the MT industry has stated that "we will accept the report from the 
committee, and we hope that the companies are unanimous in their 
understanding." 

   Vice chairman of the committee is Toyo Kato, president of Toyoda 
Machine Works.  Members of the committee include Taizo Hosoda, 
president of Okamoto Machine Tool Works, and Jiro Makino, president 
of Makino Milling Machine. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 
11) 

   Yamazaki Mazak To Quadruple Its MT Product Line -- In 1994 
Yamazaki Mazak, a major manufacturer of machine tools (MT), will 
quadruple the number of product types it offers to about 20 and 
increase its product differentiation to more closely match the needs 
of its customers.  Yamazaki Mazak will make machining centers, 
laser-processing machine tools, and multifunctional numerically 
controlled lathes the core of its product line; the new products 
will emphasize ease of use and will combine the functions of two or 
three separate machine tools.  The first of the products will be 
introduced as early as February. 

   In addition to targeting the Japan International Machine Tool 
Fair, to be held Osaka in 1994, and the U.S. International Machine 
Tool Fair in Chicago, Yamazaki Mazak will hold "private showings" 
for customers.  (Tokyo NIKAAN K0GY0 3HIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 12) 
Mori Seiki Strengthening Presence in Europe -- Mori Seiki, a 
major machine tools (MT) manufacturer, will strengthen its European 
presence this year by opening technical centers in Italy and 
Germany.  Mori Seiki is doing this to better position itself in the 
European market, which is "showing signs of bottoming out," and to 
compensate for the slump in domestic orders. 

   The Italian technical center will cost nearly 500 million yen 
($4.5 million) and will be built in Milan on land Mori Seiki already 
owns.  Sales by the technical center will replace Mori Seiki's MT 
exports to Italy, which have averaged about 5.6 units per month. 
The German technical center, to be built at a cost of 600 million 
yen ($5.5 million), will be located in Stuttgart in a building owned 
by Mori Seiki.  It will absorb the functions of the company's 
existing business office.  Mori Seiki had been exporting 10 MT units 
per month to Germany.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 14) 

   Toyoda Machine Works Halts MT Production in U.S. -- Toyoda 
Machine Works, a machine tool (MT) and auto-parts manufacturer 
belonging to the Toyota Motor Group, will halt its MT manufacturing 
operations in the United States, according to the 17 January ASAHI 
SHIMBUN.  Currently Toyoda Machine Works makes MT equipment at its 
Arlington Heights, Illinois subsidiary, Toyoda Machinery USA. 
Toyoda decided that with the abolition of the MT voluntary restraint 
agreement (VPA) with the United States at the end of 1993, it could 
meet U.S. demand for its products by exports from Japan.  Toyoda 
Machinery USA will continue to operate its service, repair, and 
business departments. 

   The 25 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that the Ministry 
of International Trade and Industry (MITI) formally announced on 24 
December that at the end of 1993 it would abolish its MT VRA with 
the United States and its "lowest export price restraint" agreement 
with 16 European countries. 

   The 16 January CHUNICHI SHIMBUN adds that workers at Toyoda 
Machinery USA's Arlington Heights plant will be cut by about half, 
from 200 at the end of 1993 to about 100.  MC production at the 
plant had been about 3 units per month, down from peak output of 15 
per month.  Toyoda Machine USA has incurred cumulative losses of 
about 20 billion yen ($181.8 million). CHUNICHI SHIMBUN adds that 
Toyoda Machinery USA closed its Howell, Michigan plant in 1992, 
leaving Toyoda Koki Brazil (TKB) as Toyoda Machine Works' last 
overseas production base.  The Brazilian plant's current production 
of lathes "is in the single digit range." 

   Tsugami To Shift MT Parts Production to Subsidiaries -- Tsugami, 
a major machine tools (MT) manufacturer, will shift production of MT 
precision parts to two subsidiary companies, Tsugami Tool and 
Chikuma Engineer, to reduce fixed costs.  Tsugami Tool's Nagaoka 
plant, located in Nagaoka City, Niigata Prefecture, which now makes 
collet chucks, will assume responsibility for producing small 
precision automated lathes.  Chikuma Engineer's Shinshu plant in 
Saku City, Nagano Prefecture, which currently makes parts and 
overhauls machinery, will assume responsibility for manufacturing 
industrial machinery.  In addition, Tsugami was to have temporarily 
transferred ten workers to each subsidiary by the end of 1993. 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Jan 94 p 12) 

   Dijet Industrial Downgrades 43 Executive Positions -- Dijet 
Industrial Co., a major manufacturer of cutting tools used in the 
machine tools (MT) industry, will downgrade the positions of three 
managing directors and 40 division chiefs due to the prolonged 
recession in the industry.  Dijet's sales for FY93 are expected to 
total 8.5 billion yen ($77.3 million), down about 10 percent from 
FY92, and its current losses will be about 1.6 billion yen ($14.5 
million). 

   Dijet will reorganize its production plant and streamline its 
organization.  This will result in the positions of managing 
directors in charge of the business, production, and technical 
departments being downgraded to the rank of director and their 
salaries cut.  Also, 40 of Dijet's 80 division chief positions will 
be downgraded to deputy division chiefs and the salaries of these 
officials will be reduced accordingly.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 12 Jan 
94 p 13) 

   November MT Sales Fell 27.2 Percent, Remain at Low Level -- A 
survey conducted by the Japan Machine Tool Builders' Association 
(JMTBA) and released on 10 January reports that November machine 
tool (MT) sales fell 27.2 percent from November 1992 to 37.816 
billion yen ($343.8 million).  This is the second consecutive month 
that overall sales have remained under the 40 billion yen ($363.6 
million) level.  Total domestic sales in November came to 20.907 
billion yen ($190.06 million), down 32.3 percent.  MT orders from 
the auto, general-purpose machinery, and electrical equipment 
industries increased, but orders from the machinery manufacturing 
industry fell 35.8 percent.  Export sales were down 19.7 percent 
year-on-year to 16.99 billion yen ($154.45 million). 

   Cumulative sales for the first 11 months of 1993 totaled 491.729 
billion yen ($4.47 billion), down 25.7 percent.  The JMTBA predicts 
that sales for the entire year will probably not exceed 530 billion 
yen ($4.82 billion).  (Tokyo NIH0N KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 p 13) 
Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics -- NEC To Mass Produce Logic 
Semiconductors With 0.35 Micron Geometries  --  On 3 January NEC 
announced that it will begin the world's first mass production of 
logic semiconductors incorporating "leading edge" 0.35 micron design 
geometries.  In 1993, NEC used the 0.35 micron design in its 64- 
megabit (MB) dynamic random access memory (DRAM) chips.  The new 
logic chips will have the ability to instantaneously control audio 
and video information, and will be used in next-generation 
multimedia workstations and personal computers.  NEC plans to 
produce the chips at its No. 8 plant in Kyushu, which will be 
completed in August 1994, and to have samples ready for shipment by 
yearend. 

   NEC's mass production of logic chips in Kyushu is expected to 
reinvigorate the semiconductor industry there.  Kyushu currently 
produces 40 percent of Japan's semiconductors by volume and 30 
percent by value, which came to 850 billion yen ($7.73 billion) in 
1992.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Fujitsu Attempting To Seize Lead in Logic Chip Production -- 
Fujitsu will build a "leading-edge" production line to manufacture 
logic chips with 0.35-micron design geometries.  The line will be 
built at Fujitsu's Aizuwakamatsu plant No. 2 in Fukushima, next to 
an existing 0.5-micron logic chip production line.  The investment 
for manufacturing equipment alone is estimated at 5 to 10 billion 
yen ($45-90 million).  Fujitsu expects to complete the line by the 
end of 1994 and, following test operations, will begin mass 
production in 1995.  The initial processing capacity will be on the 
scale of 5,000 6-inch wafers per month. 

   Until now, Japanese semiconductor manufacturers have always first 
introduced leading-edge technology in memory chips, where they have 
been strongest, and then have applied the technology in making logic 
chips.  However, Fujitsu has decided to change its strategy and 
attempt to seize the lead in microprocessors from U.S. semiconductor 
manufacturers by using the O.35-micron design on logic chips. 
Fujitsu is the first domestic manufacturer to adopt this strategy, 
but it will not necessarily be the last.  The change is seen as 
"essential" in competing with U.S. manufacturers and in improving 
Fujitsu's earnings, which have suffered because of competition from 
South Korean chip manufacturers.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 Jan 
94 p 1) 

   Imports of South Korean Semiconductors Surge -- Japanese imports 
of South Korean semiconductors are surging after a period of gradual 
expansion with demand for memory chips particularly strong.  Since 
May, South Korean memory chips have accounted for over 40 percent of 
monthly import totals, and in November the rate reached 56 percent, 
2.4-times greater than total memory device imports from the United 
States.  In addition, as regards the entire Japanese semiconductor 
market, South Korea has surpassed Europe and now holds more than 3 
percent of the market. 

   In November imports of memory devices from South Korea totaled 
9.4 billion yen ($86 million), of which the main component was the 4 
megabit (MB) dynamic random access memory (DRAM) chips.  Japanese 
firms are also interested in importing South Korean mask read-only 
memory (ROM) chips.  According to an official of a Japanese 
subsidiary of a South Korean semiconductor company, Japanese firms 
"never before showed any interest" in South Korean chips, but now 
are approaching the subsidiary for discussions. 

   There are several reasons for the large increase in imports from 
South Korea.  First, the rapid expansion of the U.S. personal 
computer market has led to tight supplies of memory chips.  U.S. 
producers reportedly "have their hands full" supplying domestic 
demand and have "no extra" chips to export to Japan.  In fact, 
exports to the United States of Japanese-made memories are also 
increasing; domestic Japanese chip consumers, who have had 
difficulty securing adequate memory supplies, are turning to South 
Korean manufacturers.  Second, this trend has been facilitated by 
the appreciation of the yen and the depreciation of the won. 
Consequently, as South Korean semiconductor makers continue to 
expand production capacity, it is likely that semiconductor imports 
from South Korea will continue to increase.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN Evening Edition 27 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites -- NEC To Shift Production of SONET 
System Equipment to U.S. -- NEC will transfer all production related 
to its SONET (synchronous optical networks) systems to its NEC 
America subsidiary by March 1994 and begin manufacturing all SONET 
equipment targeted for the U.S. market at its NEC America plant in 
Oregon in an effort to improve production efficiency.  Currently NEC 
Miyagi, an NEC subsidiary, jointly coordinates business activities 
related to U.S.-bound SONET systems equipment with NEC America. The 
Miyagi plant supplies equipment with high-speed transmission 
capacities of 150 megabits per second, 600 megabits per second, and 
2.4 gigabits per second to several "Baby Bell" companies, including 
U.S. West. 

   NEC decided to shift production to the United States because of 
the yen's appreciation and because of an expected surge in demand 
for this type of equipment as a result of the Clinton 
administration's "information superhighway" initiative.  As a result 
of the shift, the Oregon plant will increase its current output of 
2,500 systems annually to 4,000.  NEC is targeting U.S. orders worth 
$120 million over the next two years.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
10 Jan 94 p 6) 

   NEC, Fujitsu Target U.S. Market For ATM Switching Equipment -- 
NEC will produce ATM (asynchronous transfer mode) switching 
equipment--new systems that are considered the "heartbeat" of the 
Clinton administration's "information superhighway" plan--in the 
United States, according to the 13 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 
NEC has been manufacturing ATM switching equipment in Japan at its 
subsidiary, NEC Tohoku, located in Ichinoseki City, Iwate 
Prefecture, for export to the United States, but decided to shift 
production to the United States because of the yen's appreciation. 
NEC is also seeking to "nip in the bud" any potential U.S.-Japan 
friction in the communications industry, because communications 
technology is often linked with U.S. national security issues. 

   According to NIKKEI, NEC plans to launch a "marketing offensive" 
toward the U.S. "Baby Bell" companies in anticipation of a rapid 
increase in demand for ATM equipment.  It has already supplied the 
Williams Telecommunications Group, a U.S. long-distance 
communications company, with 19 sets of its "NEAX-61 ATM service 
node" and is currently negotiating a contract with Bell Atlantic. 

   Fujitsu, also a major manufacturer of communications equipment, 
is planning to make ATM switching equipment a new "pillar" of its 
operations, according to the 7 January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  Fujitsu 
focused its efforts on ATM technology in the early 1980's and is 
ahead of other manufacturers in developing ATM switching equipment. 
Currently two "Baby Bell" companies, BellSouth and Nynex, are using 
about 20 Fujitsu ATM switching systems, and two others are using 
Fujitsu equipment on a trial basis. 

   SANKEI notes that Fujitsu has "pushed aside" U.S. 
telecommunications giant AT and T to become the "sole leader" in the 
ATM switching equipment industry.  It anticipates a "trillion dollar 
market" in the future, when the use of ATM switching systems--valued 
at several billion yen each (1 billion yen equals $9 million)- 
-quickly expands as the "information superhighway" is completed 
throughout the United States.  AT and T and global communications 
manufacturers such as France's Alcatel Alsthom have launched ATM 
development projects in an attempt to compete with Fujitsu, SANKEI 
observes, so that the "communications battle" to be world leader of 
the "information revolution" has begun. 

   Sanyo, Northern Telecom To Market Multimedia Products in Canada 
-- Sanyo Electric has announced that it will cooperate with Canada's 
Northern Telecom to jointly develop and market communications and 
multimedia equipment in Canada.  Sanyo will market two cordless 
telephone models, the "NOMAD6500" and "N0MAD630O," which the two 
companies jointly developed.  Sanyo will supply its technology for 
cordless telephones, batteries, and liquid crystal displays, while 
Northern Telecom will contribute its digital technologies to jointly 
develop next-generation telephones, components, and semiconductors 
for the multimedia market. 

   In addition, the two companies will cooperate on developing 
markets for other communications products, including mobile 
telephones and facsimile machines.  The two firms will have a 
combined market share of 40 percent in Canada for telephones and 
related products, and hope that by joining together they can 
penetrate the consumer market even further.  After they are 
successful in Canada, they will expand their cooperative efforts to 
the United States and the rest of the world.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 3) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments  --  Twenty State Enterprises To 
List on Hong Kong Bourse in 1994 - Professor Liu Hongru, chairman of 
China's Securities Supervision and Administration Committee, has 
said that 20 state-owned enterprises will list on the Hong Kong 
Stock Exchange this year.  Some will also have secondary listings on 
the New York and London stock exchanges, with a small number having 
their primary listings in New York.  Professor Liu said that Hong 
Kong was a financial center in which international investors had 
great confidence, and that after 1997, the "one country, two 
systems" policy would enable Hong Kong to maintain its bridging 
role.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 19 Jan 94 p AS) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Shanghai's Private Economy Outstrips Overall Economy -- The year 
1993 saw a 30 percent increase in Shanghai's private economy for the 
second consecutive year compared to a 15 percent rise in Shanghai's 
overall economy.  As of the end of the year, there were 126,600 
individually owned business households in the city, employing 
178,600 people.  There were also 7,610 privately owned enterprises 
employing 108,400 people, compared to none in the beginning of 1988. 

   Privately owned enterprises have begun operating on company 
lines, and the number of limited liability companies increased by 
1,715 last year.  Privately owned joint ventures, which were first 
seen in August 1992, numbered 22 at year's end.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0450 GMT 15 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Registered Company Start-Ups in Shanghai Increase 153 Percent -- 
Almost 34,000 registered companies were established in the January 
to September period of 1993 in Shanghai, an increase of 153 percent 
over the figures for the same period of 1992.  Of the 33,824 
companies set up, 11,579 were state-owned companies, 17,357 were 
collectively owned companies, and 4,888 were companies of other 
types.  The number of companies involved in tertiary industry stood 
at 28,155, constituting 83.2 percent of the total.  (Hong Kong 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0901 GMT 31 Dec 93)  Hong Kong Bureau 
CEITIC To Move Gold, Foreign Currency Focus to Shanghai -- The 
China Everbright International Trust and Investment Corporation 
(CElTIC) will start trading foreign currencies and gold in Shanghai 
early in 1994.  "Well-placed sources" revealed that Shanghai would 
lead the nation in foreign currency and gold business.  Ye Kequan, 
director of CEITIC's Shanghai branch, said they were preparing to 
set up a swap market in Pudong "which binds insurance and trading of 
securities, foreign currencies, gold, real estate, and futures 
together."  He also said CElTIC would move its business focus to 
Shanghai in anticipation of a new economic and financial boom. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY 8 Jan 94 p 2)  Hong Kong Bureau/ 

   Hunan Launches 23 High-Tech Projects in 1993 -- On 31 December 
the casting and fireproofing material development project sponsored 
by the China Building Material Research Institute and 22 other high- 
tech projects were ready to be implemented in the high-tech 
development zones in Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtang, and other cities 
of Hunan Province.  By the end of 1993, 478 high-tech enterprises 
had been established and 640 high-tech projects had been launched in 
the new high-tech corridor, turning in an annual output value of 
more than 700 million yuan.  The new high-tech corridor, which has 
drawn in 1.78 billion yuan worth of investment, comprises the five 
new and high-tech development zones of Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtan, 
Yueyang, and Hengyang and covers more than 20 counties and cities. 
(Changsha Hunan People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 2 Jan 94)  Hong Kong 
Bureau- 

   Growth in Individual, Private Economic Sectors in Yunnan Reported 
- Individual and private economic sectors in Yunnan Province 
developed rapidly in 1993.  As of the end of December there were 
more than 442,200 individual industrial and commercial households in 
the province, involving more than 646,000 people, an increase of 
18.71 percent and 19.8 percent respectively over the previous year. 
There were also 1,563 private enterprises, an increase of 49.86 
percent over the previous year.  The proportion of people engaged in 
individual and private enterprises to the province's total 
population rose from 1.47 percent in 1992 to 1.78 percent.  (Kunming 
Yunnan Radio Network 1000 GMT 7 Jan 94)  Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  Japanese Rank First Among Foreign 
Investors in Hong Kong -- In recent years, Japanese companies have 
continued to increase their investments in Hong Kong, many of them 
attracted by the economic growth of mainland China.  In the last 10 
years, Japanese companies have replaced American and British firms 
as the largest foreign investor in Hong Kong.  In order to lower 
operational costs and compete for greater market share, Japanese 
manufacturing enterprises have been increasing their overseas 
investments, and Hong Kong is a key point for such investment 
because of its proximity to China.  According to Hong Kong 
Government statistics, by the end of 1992, cumulative investment 
from Japan amounted to HK$124.45 bilLion, and Japanese companies 
fixed assets in Hong Kong totaled HK$85.16 billion, exceeding that 
of American corporations, who ranked second.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE 0812 GMT 11 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau/ 

   Capital Steel Seeks Hong Kong Funding for Shandong Plant -- The 
parent company of Hong Kong-listed Shougang International has 
announced its involvement in a project to build a HK$45 billion 
steel plant in Shandong.  Capital Iron and Steel Company Limited 
(Shougang) will raise more than HK$22.5 billion on overseas markets 
and through the introduction of foreign investors.  The plant, which 
will be situated in Quli, Shandong Province, will have an annual 
capacity of 10 million tonnes.  Sources said they expected Capital 
Iron and Steel's Hong Kong-listed subsidiary Shougang Concord 
Holdings to play a key role in raising overseas capital for the 
joint venture project with the Shandong provincial government.  The 
state would not provide funds for the project, but the new firm is 
expected to enjoy the same benefits and concessions as Sino-foreign 
joint ventures. (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 17 
Jan 94 p 1) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Hong Kong-Based Firm Invests in Guangzhou Steel Mill -- The Hong 
Kong-based Guangzhou Enterprise (Group) Company Limited is one of 
five underwriters for the Guangzhou Zhujiang Steel Plant, the 
largest construction project in the Guangzhou Development Zone. The 
plant, recently approved by the State Council, requires HK$620 
million for its first phase of construction.  It will begin 
production in July 1996.  The other underwriters are Guangzhou 
Economic Construction and Development Company, Guangzhou Metallurgy 
Company, Guangzhou Development Zone State-Owned Asset Investment 
Company, and the Guangzhou International Trust and Investment 
Company.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1118 GMT 18 Jan 94) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Burmah Castrol, Shenzhen Jinke To Establish Joint Venture -- 
British lubricants and specialty chemicals manufacturer Burmah 
Castrol is to establish a HK$15 million joint venture in Shenzhen to 
manufacture and market products used in the aluminum industry. 
Linking up with Shenzhen Jinke, which supplies grain refining 
tablets and fluxes to Chinese primary and secondary users, the new 
firm is to be called Foresco Jinke.  The initial capital will be 
used to set up a new factory close to Jinke's existing production 
facilities.  Under the deal both companies will hold 50 percent 
stakes in the company, though the HK$15 million cash investment is 
being made in Castrol, with Jinke reciprocating through assets and 
their established market base.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 12 Jan 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   UK Firm To Establish Video-Conferencing Facilities in Hubei -- 
GPT Video Systems, a subsidiary of GPT Limited of Britain, has 
signed a $3 million deal with the Hubei Post and Telecommunications 
Administration for the provision of advanced video-conferencing 
facilities in Wuhan, Hubei Province.  A GPT official said this will 
be the largest video-conferencing network in China.  This contract 
represents GPT's first deal with a Chinese customer in 1994, 
following five contracts for similar equipment signed in 1993 with 
Hunan and Shaanxi Provinces and the Capital Iron and Steel 
Corporation in Beijing.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 12 Jan 94 p 2) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Swiss Pharmaceutical Firm Plans $30 Million Factory in Shanghai 
-- Swiss pharmaceutical company Hof fman-La Roche is to set up a $30 
million factory with Shanghai San Wei Pharmaceutical Corporation to 
make pharmaceuticals.  The joint venture, to be known as Shanghai 
Roche Pharmaceuticals Company, will be 70 percent owned by Roche and 
30 percent owned by San Wei, Shanghai's largest pharmaceutical 
factory.  The factory, to be located in the Zhangjiang High-Tech 
Zone in the Pudong Industrial Area, will begin full operations in 
late 1996, making products such as anticancer and cardiovascular 
drugs, antibiotics, and multivitamins.  Until the factory is 
completed Roche will help upgrade production facilities at San Wei's 
plant to process some products of the joint venture.  These will be 
sold under the joint venture trademark between 1994 and 1996.  (Hong 
Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 8 Jan 94 p 2) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Shandong Approval of Taiwan-Invested Projects Up 180 Percent in 
1993 -- In 1993 Shandong Province witnessed noticeable achievements 
in developing economic and trade contacts with Taiwan.  According to 
statistics, the province approved 1,154 Taiwan-invested projects, up 
180 percent over 1992.  These projects involved a total investment 
of $1.875 billion, up 140 percent over 1992; and the contracts 
signed with Taiwan businessmen involved a total investment of $942 
million, up 150 percent over 1992.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 GMT 
12 Jan 94) Seoul Bureaus 

   Taiwan:  Lowest Trade Surplus in 10 Years Reported -- Taiwan 
broke four foreign trade records in 1993.  The total volume of 
import-export trade reached a record $162.03 billion, up 5.6 percent 
over 1992.  The trade surplus with Hong Kong topped $16.72 billion, 
a record for a single region.  The trade deficit with Japan reached 
a record $14.22 billion.  The proportion of heavy-industry and 
chemical products exceeded half of exports for the first time. 
However, the Ministry of Finance's report released on 6 January 
shows the total trade surplus of $7.87 billion was the lowest since 
1984.  Taiwan's trade surplus with the United States was down to 
$6.76 billion, and its trade with Europe showed a deficit of $670 
million, the first in two decades.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 7 Jan 
p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Procedures for Foreign Investment To Be Simplified -- On 30 
December the Ministry of Economic Affairs (MOEA) decided that in the 
future overseas Chinese may continue to invest in Taiwan in the 
capacity of natural citizens, but the procedures for accepting 
investment from overseas Chinese and foreigners would be simplified 
from the current system of evaluation and approval to merely 
registration.  The MOEA, which held a meeting on 30 December to 
discuss amending regulations governing investment in Taiwan by 
overseas Chinese and foreigners, also proposed to abolish the 
stipulation restricting overseas Chinese and foreigners from 
converting foreign exchange in the first year of operation so they 
may directly invest with New Taiwan (NT) dollars.  According to the 
Investment Commission under the MOEA, the proposed amendments are 
designed to boost foreign investment, make the island an operational 
center in the Asia-Pacific region, and facilitate Taiwan's accession 
to the General Agreement of Tariffs and Trade.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-BAO 31 Dec p 2) Okinawa Bureaus/ 

   Survey Shows Over 30 Countries Impose Trade Barriers on Taiwan -- 
A recent survey conducted by the Chinese Federation of Industries 
showed that presently over 30 countries have imposed trade barriers, 
both tariff and otherwise, against Taiwan.  These include Japan, the 
United States, Australia, most European nations, and Southeast Asian 
nations such as Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, and the Philippines. 
Industries affected include steel plating, foodstuff, computers, 
auto parts and accessories, and information.  Manufacturers strongly 
urged the government to fight for the rights and opportunities of 
fair competition.  Koo Chen-fu, chairman of the Chinese National 
Association of Industry and Commerce, said, "Since the government 
promotes trade liberalization, it should help manufacturers compete 
internationally on an equal footing with the same industries in 
every country."  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 1 Jan p 9) Okinawa 
Bureau/ 

   Labor Productivity Growth Expected To Show Decline for 1993 -- 
The Executive Yuan's Council for Economic Planning and Development 
pointed out that labor productivity growth in 1993 is not expected 
to exceed 3.5 percent, the lowest growth in nine years. The council 
cited as major reasons for the decline readjustments in the 
industrial structure, transfers of industries overseas, an increase 
in foreign laborers, and failure of enterprises to invest in 
automation and personnel training.  Therefore, the government should 
address these areas to promote labor productivity growth, and 
economic development.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO   3 Jan p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Minister on World Economic Blocs, Future Trade Focus -- With the 
world divided into three economic blocs following the establishment 
of the European Union and NAFTA on 1 January, Minister of Economics 
Chiang Ping-kun said the pivotal axis of Taiwan's future development 
will lie in Asia, though attention will still be given to its 
development in other economic regions.  He envisaged that Taiwan's 
exports to the Asian market in 1994 will proportionally account for 
over 50 percent of its total exports to world markets.  His ministry 
has decided to substantially readjust the focus of Taiwan's 
investments and exports; the Asia region will feature prominently in 
this respect.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 2 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Cross-Strait Trade Expected To Total $20 Billion in 1994 -- The 
Ministry of Economic Affairs estimates cross-Strait trade will total 
$20 billion in 1994, and Taiwan's imports from the PRC will 
increase.  However, Taiwanese investors will reconsider their 
investment plans for the PRC in view of the uncertain factors caused 
by PRC macroeconomic regulation and control. According to the 
ministry's statistics, 9,470 enterprises invested in the PRC last 
year with a total capital of $3.52 billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
BAO 4 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureaus 

   Company To Examine Tenders for Nuclear Power Plant No. 4 -- The 
Taiwan Power Corporation will begin examining tenders for two U.S. 
firms and one French firm beginning 10 January for the construction 
of its fourth nuclear power plant, which is expected to be 
operational in January 2001 at the earliest.  The corporation's 
deputy general manager said the current tenders are for the 
construction of the nuclear reactor and for the supply of nuclear 
fuel, the project's most important components costing over $2 
billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 9 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureaus 

   Relief Measures Drafted To Help Industries Hit by Imported Goods 
-- The Ministry of Economic Affairs has decided to provide temporary 
relief measures to Taiwan industries whose interests are seriously 
jeopardized by an influx of foreign goods.  These measures, which 
will be in effect for a period of three years, include increases in 
tariffs, introduction of tariffs and import quotas, entering into 
marketing agreements with exporting countries, and provisions for 
financial guarantees.  The draft "Measures for Handling Import 
Relief Cases" formulated by the ministry has been submitted to the 
Executive Yuan and is expected to be implemented as soon as a trade 
investigation commission has been established under the ministry. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 3 Jan p 1) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Export Growth, Industrial Output Projections Reported -- Taiwan's 
export growth is expected to continue, but the real estate market 
will continue to slow down.  Minister of Economic Affairs Chiang 
Ping-kun said Taiwan's export growth and industrial output for 1994 
will total 8.2 percent and 4.52 percent respectively.  To conform 
with its plan to join GATT and fulfill its promise to the United 
States to lower customs tariffs, Taiwan will lower customs tariffs 
on several products, even though it may affect such relevant 
industries as the steel, automobile, and petrochemical industries. 
The progress of over 500 national construction projects is still 
slow, and nearly half of the projects have fallen behind schedule. 
In addition, to raise funds for the projects the Taiwan Government 
will appropriately cut the amount of normal spending.  (Taipei 
CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 3 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Export Exchange Earnings for December Reach Record High -- 
According to statistics by the Central Bank of China, Taiwan's 
export exchange earnings of $8.35 billion for December 1993 was a 
record for any single month.  It shows a notable backward flow of 
Taiwanese firms' foreign exchange funds at the end of the year.  The 
total exchange income and exchange expenditures in 1993 totaled $88 
billion and $74.1 billion respectively.  The surplus of $13.89 
billion was a growth of 9 percent over 1992.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
BAO 11 Jan p 1) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   NORTH KOREA:  Light Industry To Focus on Production, Quality 
Control Goals -- Ri Ki-do, director of the Production Guidance 
Department under the Light Industry Committee, recently said that 
the committee is making comprehensive plans to sharply increase the 
production of textiles, daily necessities, and processed foods, as 
well as to improve the quality and variety of consumer goods in 
order to promote development of the light industry, which was 
designated as a top priority at the 21st Plenary Session of the 
Sixth Party Central Committee.  During its plenum in December, the 
party decided to focus on agriculture, light industry, and trade to 
meet the goals of the Third Seven-Year Plan (1987-1993) during the 
adjustment period in the next two to three years. 

   According to Ri, the General Bureau of Textile Industry under the 
Light Industry Committee is calling for modernization of textile 
factories and  increased production of high-quality cloth (made of 
vinylon) and knitwear. Ri also said that the General Bureau of the 
shoemaking industry is working on improving the quality of 
domestically made shoes. 

   Ri noted that since the 16th Plenary Session of the Sixth Party 
Central Committee, the clothing sector's production capacity has 
"improved significantly" thanks to the new equipment that has been 
installed and to the modernization of the Pyongyang United Textile 
Factory and other factories in Kusong, Sariwon, and Kaesong.  Ri 
added that shoe manufacturing has also improved and that a greater 
variety of shoes is now available to consumers.  He also remarked on 
general improvements in the processing of staple and non-staple food 
items and the production of daily necessities.  (Pyongyang MINJU 
CHOSON 16 Dec 93 p 3) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Business Plans of Major Conglomerates for 
1994 Highlighted -- SUMMARY:  Recent press articles highlight some 
of the main business projects and investment targets in 1994 for 
major conglomerates.  The 30 largest groups plan to increase their 
investment in facilities and R and D by 45.8 percent over 1993 
levels.  They also intend to expand actively abroad, and may use 
their overseas R and D centers to obtain foreign technology and take 
it back to South Korea. 

   According to the 4 January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), the 30 
largest ROK conglomerates will invest 23.3 trillion won ($29.125 
billion) in facilities and 680 trillion won ($850 billion) in R and 
D in 1994.  Their total overall investment will be 45.8 percent 
higher than in 1993.  The groups plan to increase their R and D 
investment by 34 percent in order to expand existing technologies 
and respond to other countries' IPR (intellectual property rights) 
"protectionist barriers."  MKS reports that the groups also intend 
to invest actively abroad to expand their overseas production base. 
In a separate article in the same 4 January issue, MKS states that 
the need for "aggressive technology transfers" is growing, even in 
the area of patents, as advanced countries "avoid" transferring 
advanced technologies.  MKS explains that ROK firms will be able to 
use R and D centers established in the United States, Japan, and the 
EC as windows through which they can "grab" the global flow of 
technology and import foreign technology back home. 

   MKS also offers details of conglomerates' major investment goals 
and projects.  They include infrastructure projects and production- 
related projects located both domestically and overseas.  Some of 
the projects of the 10 largest conglomerates include: 

   Samsung:  domestically--six semiconductor production lines, an 
automobile plant, the new international airport at Yongjong Island, 
a canal between Seoul and Inchon, development of Nanji Island, the 
electric rail between Pundang-Yongin-Suwon, a new composite city at 
Yongin, developing space under Yoido Plaza;  overseas--a 
refrigerator factory in the Kazakh Republic, a joint-venture 
semiconductor factory in Portugal in cooperation with Texas 
Instruments, an electronics and VCR factory in China. 
Hyundai:  domestically--a production line exclusively for 16M 
DRAM (dynamic random access memory) chips, an automobile plant, an 
oil refinery, development of the Yongjong Island airport, power 
plant construction, container terminal projects for Pusan and 
Kwangyang, development of the Yulchon industrial complex;  overseas- 
-establishment of construction companies in China and Indonesia, an 
$8.6-million automobile plant in Malaysia, investments worth $27 
million in Vietnam, Thailand, Singapore, and India, expansion of a 
refrigerated storage facility in Tijuana, Mexico. 
   Lucky-Goldstar:  domestically--plastic fuel tanks, mass 
production of thin film technology liquid crystal displays (TFT 
LCD's), mass production of 16M DRAM's, nuclear power generation, 
power plant construction;  overseas--a plastics factory in Pakistan, 
a cosmetics factory and a VCR factory in China, a color television 
factory in Vietnam, a pump factory in Indonesia, marketing companies 
in Australia and Spain. 

   Daewoo:  domestically--the Kunsan automobile plant, a high-tech 
research institute, light-rail business;  overseas--automobile 
assembly plants in Libya and Iran, R and D centers in the United 
States, Japan, and Europe, cotton mills in Uzbekistan and Sudan. 

   Sunkyong:  domestically--a fluid catalytic cracking facility, 
renovation of production facilities, investment in ships and new 
shipbuilding, stage two of the Polmosang Tunnel, an open-air storage 
yard for containers in Yangsan;  overseas--developing oil fields 
overseas. 

   Ssangyong:  domestically--a shipping and distribution base, 
middle-grade oil cracking, crude oil refining, developing small-size 
commercial vehicles and passenger cars;  overseas--a joint-venture 
cement factory in Vietnam in cooperation with Korea Heavy Industries 
and Vietnam, developing overseas resources. 

   Kia:  domestically--Kia's second automobile plant at Asan Bay, an 
Asia Motors plant for large trucks and buses;  overseas--an 
automobile assembly plant in Indonesia. 

   Hanjin:  domestically--aircraft purchases, shipbuilding, high- 
speed rail, light rail, land reclamation in Yongdo;  overseas--a 
terminal in Tokyo for Hanjin Shipping's exclusive use. 

   Hanhwa:  domestically--facilities for middle-grade oil cracking 
and desulfurization, enlargement of PVC (polyvinyl chloride) 
facilities. 

   Lotte:  domestically--a Lotte Samkang factory in Chonan, the 
Pusan World Hotel;  overseas--expansion of the Lotteria in Shanghai. 
With regard to sales targets, the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reports that in 1994 most groups want to increase total sales 
between 10 and 20 percent, with seven groups aiming for increases of 
more than 30 percent.  The automobile sector wants to increase sales 
by 30 percent, while the electronics sector is looking for a 20- 
percent increase.  CHUGAN comments that the five main car makers 
have a combined sales target of 19.7 trillion won ($24.675 billion). 
This includes targets of 8.5 trillion won for Hyundai ($10.625 
billion), a 16.5-percent increase; 5.6 trillion won ($7 billion) for 
Kia, a 33-percent increase; 3.2 trillion won ($4 billion) for 
Daewoo, a 45-percent increase; 1.6 trillion won ($2 billion) for 
Asia Motors, a 50-percent increase; and 860 billion won ($1.075 
billion) for Ssangyong, an increase of more than 100 percent. 

   There are also plans to greatly increase investments in the 
electronics (semiconductors), heavy industry, and oil refining 
sectors, CHUGAN reports.  However, groups doing business in textiles 
plan to reduce their shares of investment in and sales from 
synthetic textiles.  CHUGAN breaks down some of each company's 
investments by business line:  Samsung will invest 500 billion won 
($625 million) to build a semiconductor production line, 150 billion 
won ($187.5 million) to expand a passenger car plant, and 65 billion 
won ($81.25 million) in its aircraft (fighter) business.  Hyundai 
will invest 1.12 trillion won ($1.4 billion) in its automobile 
business, and 1.1 trillion won ($1.375 billion) in its semiconductor 
business.  Lucky-Goldstar will invest 450 billion won ($562.5 
million) in its Goldstar company, 250 billion won ($312.5 million) 
in its Lucky company, and 100 billion won ($125 million) in its 
technical research institute.  Daewoo will concentrate most of its 
domestic investment in its Kunsan automobile plant.  Sunkyong Group 
will invest 800 billion won ($1 billion) in its Yukong subsidiary. 
Ssangyong Group plans to invest 600 billion won ($750 million) in 
oil refining, 500 billion won ($625 million) in automobile 
manufacturing, and 300 billion won ($375 million) in cement 
production.  Finally, CHUGAN notes that Hanjin Group will invest 550 
billion won ($687.5 million) to import a new type of aircraft. 

   The following table lists the sales and investment targets for 
the 10 biggest conglomerates, along with the increase (in percent) 
over 1993 levels.  The figures were compiled from articles in the 4 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN and the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

BOT 
                           Investment in    Investment in 
              Sales        --Facilities---         R and D 

Name    1994    Change*    1994   Change*    1994   Change* 

Samsung N/A*    -          3,300  22.2       1,300  18.1 

Hyundai N/A*    -          3,300  141        1,200  76.5 

Lucky- 
Goldstar        N/A*              2,200      37.5   1,000       33.3 

Daewoo  35,500  31.3      1,730   49.7       1,122  36 

Sunkyong        20,430     15.6   1,530      31.8   170         21.4 

Ssangyong       13,700     16.1   1,500      150    100         42.8 

Kia      9,000  34.3       1,040  22.3       300    36.3 

Hanjin   7,300  10.6       1,280  8          70     7.6 

Lotte    6,800  17.2       650    62.5       80     33 

Hanhwa   6,800  17.2       N/A*   -          N/A 

Note*: N/A denotes data not available.  Change denotes percent 
increase over 1993 level.  Unit for sales and investment amounts is 
1 billion won. 

EOT 

   FEATURE:  S and T 1994 Budget, S and T Accomplishments for 1993 
Reported -- SUMMARY:  The ROK Government's 1994 S and T budget of 
nearly 2 trillion won ($2.5 billion) is the country's largest to 
date, representing 2.2 percent of the national budget and a 32.7- 
percent increase over last year, according to press reports. 
Figures on the distribution of funds among the ministries, and 
within the Ministry of Science and Techhnology (MOST), are provided 
along with one magazine's view of MOST's chief successes. 

   South Korea's 1994 science and technology budget--defined as 
"direct support" for S and T activities to agencies of the central 
government, including an R and D budget, S and T promotion budget, 
and administrative budget-- has been set at 1.9596 trillion won 
($2.45 billion), according to the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  The 
amount is 32.7 percent higher than 1993's reported S and T budget of 
1.4767 trillion won ($1.846 billion), and compares to an increase of 
20 percent in the national budget overall.  Government S and T 
expenditures, which make up 20 percent of the total funds spent by 
South Korea on science and technology, account for 2.2 percent of 
the 1994 national budget, compared to 4.7 percent in the United 
States and 2.9 percent in Japan, the magazine reports. 

   The largest share of the new S and T budget, some 1.5132 trillion 
won ($1.892 billion), is allotted to R and D, representing a 30- 
percent increase over 1993.  Specific R and D categories reportedly 
will be funded as follows:  working expenses 305.6 billion won ($382 
million), up 53 percent from 1993; state-funded research expenses 
712.2 billion won ($890 million), up 20 percent; R and D subsidies 
252.1 billion won ($315 million), up 54 percent; and "testing and 
research expenses for national testing and research agencies" 243.3 
billion won ($304 million), up 17 percent.  According to the 5 
January CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the largest overall increase of 240 percent 
will go to the Ministry of Education, followed by the Environmental 
Agency with a 65.8-percent increase, and the Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy whose budget will grow by 49 percent.  The 
reported S and T budget for each ministry is as follows. 


     Ministry                     S and T Budget 
                                (billion won)  (million $) 

     Home Affairs                 5.656             7.03 
     Finance                      80.000            100.00 
     Defense                      352.332           440.42 
     Education                    180.705           225.88 
     Agriculture and Fisheries    13.298            16.62 
     Trade, Industry, and Energy  338.913           423.64 
     Construction                 34.953            43.69 
     Health and Social Affairs    47.188            58.99 
     Transportation               7.641             9.55 
     Communications               23.876            29.85 
     Science and Technology       610.217           762.77 
     Environmental Agency         15.861            19.83 
     Tax Administration           1.028             1.29 
     Rural Development Admin.     139.388           174.24 
     Forestry Admin.              19.645            24.56 
     Fisheries Admin.             37.555            46.94 
     Industrial Promotion Admin.  44.082            55.10 
     Patents Admin.               0.901             1.13 
     Railroad Admin.              1.510             1.89 
     Meteorology Admin.            31.805           39.76 

      S and T budgets within the Ministry of Science and Technology 
(MOST), funded by public and private sources, were reported in the 1 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) as follows. 

   Institute                   Budget                  Personnel 
                            (billion won) (million $) (PhD's) 

Korea Institute of Science     67.075       83.84     787  (247) 
   and Technology (KIST) 
System Engineering Research    28.632       35.79     357   (22) 
   Institute (SERI) 
Genetic Engineering Research   16.462       20.58     225   (73) 
   Institute (GERI) 
Research and Development        4.555        5.69      54    (1) 
   Information Center 
S and T Policy Management       7.609        9.51     114   (22) 
  Research Institute 
Korea Advanced Institute of    78.215       97.77     852  (311) 
   S and T (KAIST) 
Korea Rsch Inst of Standards   28.771       35.96     472   (99) 
   and Science (KRISS) 
National Astronomical           9.920       12.40      89   (12) 
   Observatory 
Basic Science Support          10.865       13.58      75    (9) 
   Center 
Korea Institute of Machinery   52.723       65.90     574   (95) 
   and Metals (KIMM) 
Korea Aerospace Research       23.674       29.59     127   (33) 
   Institute (KARl) 
Korea Institute of Nuclear     21.278       26.60     272   (53) 
   Safety 
Korea Atomic Energy Research  171.200      214.00    1,625 (211) 
   Institute (KAERI) 
Hospital for Nuclear           38.938       48.67     842   (38) 
   Medicine 
Nuclear Environment            72.341       90.43     320   (61) 
   Management Center 
Korea Institute of Energy      19.396       24.25     347   (83) 
   Research (KIER) 
Resources Research             29.722       37.15     457  (112) 
   Institute 
Korea Ocean Research and       27.459       34.32     347   (76) 
   Development Inst (KORDI) 
Korea Electrotechnology        25.437       31.80     325   (45) 
   Research Institute 
Korea Research Institute of    27.379       34.22     405  (110) 
   Chemical Tech (KRICT) 
Korea Science Foundation      103.887      129.86     120    (1) 

Kwangju Science and            23.970       29.96      -      - 
   Technology Institute 

Total                         889.511     1,111.87     8,786 (1,714) 



   MKS further reports that MOST reached a decision late last year 
to have its institutes "specialize," beginning this March, in 
particular fields or specific technologies.  For example, KIST will 
focus on 3-D image media technology, "human robot systems," and 
advanced medical treatments during 1994. 

   Meanwhile, the 29 December CHUGAN MAEGYONG published a list of 
MOST's major technological successes of 1993 as follows. 

   1. A "robot sculptor" that can sculpt likenesses of individual 
human faces in 20 minutes, by KIST; potential applications are in 
factory automation. 

   2. Microscopic drug capsules that are absorbed by the body over a 
long period of time, by KRICT.  Has uses in manufacturing 
gastrointestinal drugs, antibiotics, and anti-cancer drugs (see 
PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 26 29 Dec 93 pp 23-25). 

   3. A high-temperature superconducting quantum interference device 
(SQUID), by KRISS. 

   4. Technology for automated production of software, by SERI. 
Expected to save 20 billion won ($25 million) annually in imports by 
1996. 

   5. Non-polluting organic agricultural chemicals, by GERI.  Living 
microorganisms are enclosed in a biodegradable, high-polymer gel. 

   6. Exhaust valves for large diesel engines, by KIMM.  Will save 
10-15 billion won ($12.5-18.75 million) annually in imports. 

   7. Software codes for a comprehensive safety check of a nuclear 
power plant, by KAERI. 

   8. The "Our Star 2" satellite, by KAIST.  South Korea's first 
indigenous earth satellite. 

   9. A fused carbonate fuel cell, by KIST.  The 10cm x lOcm unit 
produces 100 watts of power. 

   10. A new substance (GERI-BP001) for reducing blood cholesterol 
made from aspergillus (a soil mold), by GERI. 

   11. Development of the chemical compound HFC-134a as a freon 
substitute, by KIST. 

   12. Precision laser welding equipment, by KAERI (see PACIFIC RIM 
ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 24 1 Dec 93 p 31). 

   13. Manufacturing and control technology for an ion nitriding 
electric furnace, by KIMM.  Expected to save 600 million won 
($750,000) in imports annually. 

   14. A high-temperature (140 degrees K) superconductor formed in 
high pressure mercury vapor, developed jointly by the Research 
Institute of Industrial Science and Technology and Pohang Steel. 

   15. Livestock waste water processing equipment, by KIST. 

   16. Technology to separate, gasify, and burn combustible 
industrial wastes, by KIER. 

   17. Technology to produce EPA chemical compounds from marine 
micro-organisms, by KORDI. 

   18. Design and construction of an underwater robot that can 
operate at depths of 300 meters, by KIMM. 

   19. Development of "essential technology needed to manufacture a 
solid fuel rocket motor able to lift a scientific research payload 
weighing 50-70 kg to an altitude of 80-90 km," by KARl. 

   20. Rayon twice as strong as the existing material and 
manufactured without pollutants, by KIST. 

   21. Numerical-controlled gas cutting machinery, by KIMM. 
Expected to save 3 billion won ($3.75 million) annually in imports 
costs. 

   22. Technology to reduce chemical solvent wastes, by KRICT. 

   23. Manufacture of an ultra-high precision (nanometer scale) 
lathe, by KAIST. 

   24. New automotive steel that is stronger, more malleable, and 
easier to weld, by KIST. 

   FEATURE:  Record Sales, Profits Reported for Electronics in 1993 
-- SUMMARY:  South Korea's 1993 electronics sales, driven by 
semiconductor exports and domestic demand for appliances, brought 
record profits to the country's major producers, according to press 
reports.  Figures on 1994 investment and projected sales presume a 
continuation of the same rapid growth.  The high export volume was 
generated, in part, by the ROK's ability to reduce significantly 
dumping charges levied earlier by the U.S. Government. 

   South Korea's four top electronics manufacturers--Samsung 
Electronics, Goldstar Electron, Daewoo Electronics, and Hyundai 
Electronics--finished 1993 with record sales of 15.85 trillion won 
($198 billion) for a 25.2 percent increase over 1992, according to 
the 21 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  The amount constituted 
more than half of the country's total electronics-related sales, 
with semiconductor exports and domestic appliance sales accounting 
for most of the gain.  The following data was reported by MKS. 


                            1993 Electronics Sales 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 

         Sales (percent  Exports (percent  Net Profit (percent 
          increase)      increase)         increase) 

Samsung 8.1               ---             1.5 
         ($10.1 billion) ($6.7 billion)     ($1.875 billion) 
        (32.7)            (45.0)           (107) 
Goldstar                  4.4               ---                0.70 
        ($5.5  billion)   ($3.0 billion)   ($875  million) 
        (16.4)            (16.7)           (169) 
  Daewoo  2.05            ---              0.32 
        ($2.6  billion)   ($1.75 billion)  ($400  million) 
        (19.1)            (29.6)           (93) 
  Hyundai 1.3             ---              0.35 
        ($1.6  billion)   ($1.15 billion)  ($450  million) 
        (24.0)            (22.0)           (337) 

Total    15.85            ---             2.87 
         ($19.8 billion) ($12.6 billion)    ($3.6 billion) 
        (25.2)            (33.7)           (113) 

   Projected electronics sales by the same four manufacturers in 
1994 are reported in the 4 January MKS as follows. 

               1994 Electronics Sales (projected) 
         (in trillion won unless other indication given) 

          Total              Domestic 
Percent 
          Sales              Sales             Exports 
Increase 
                             3.3               6.7              23.0 
Samsung   10 
          ($12.5  billion)   ($4.125 billion)  ($8.375 billion) 
Goldstar  5                  2.2               2.8              13.6 
          ($6.25  billion)   ($2.75 billion)   ($3.5   billion) 
Daewoo    2.6                1.0               1.6              24.0 
          ($3.25  billion)   ($1.25 billion)   ($2.0   billion) 
Hyundai   2.05               0.57              1.48             58.0 
          ($2.5625 billion)  ($712.5 million)  ($1.85  billion) 

Total     19.65              7.07              12.58            23.9 
         ($24.5625 billion)($8.8375 billion) ($15.725 billion) 

   The 27 December MKS gives the following details on Samsung's 
projected 1994 electronics sales:  3.2 trillion won ($4 billion) in 
semiconductors; 4.2 trillion won ($5.25 billion) in household 
appliances, including $2.7 billion in exports; and 2.5 trillion won 
($3.125 billion) in information processing and communications 
equipment.  The same four companies' 1994 electronics-related 
investment plans are reported in the 4 January MKS as follows. 

                   1994 Electronics-Related Investment Plans 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 
          Plant and                          Total           Percent 
          Equipment         R and D          Investment 
Increase 

Samsung  1.5                0.60             2.1              40.0 
          ($1.875 billion)  ($750  million)  ($2.625 billion) 
Goldstar  0.45              0.40             0.85             49.1 
          ($562.5 million)  ($500  million)  ($1.0625 billion) 
Daewoo    0.17              0.18             0.35             34.6 
          ($212.5 million)  ($225  million)  ($437.5 million) 
Hyundai   0.70              0.38             1.08             46.0 
          ($875 million)    ($475  million)  ($1.35 billion) 


Total      2.82             1.56             4.38             41.2 
         ($3.525 billion)  ($1.95 billion)   ($5.475 billion) 



   The 4 January MKS reports that Samsung's major investments will 
be in DRAM's, "next-generation" semiconductors, and wireless 
communications.  Goldstar will invest in mass producing thin film 
transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD's), expand its 
distribution facilities, and rationalize production; R and D will 
concentrate on multimedia and enviroiimentally friendly household 
appliances.  Hyundai will put 1 trillion won ($1.25 billion) in 16M 
DRAM production equipment, the paper states.  In its 22 December 
issue, MKS reports Daewoo has decided to move "full-scale" into 
semiconductors.  Unlike the three majors which have concentrated on 
DRAM's, Daewoo will focus on application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's), particularly for use in automobiles and 
appliances. 

   The reported high increases in R and D and plant investment, 
largely semiconductor-related, coincide with a study by the Korea 
Semiconductor Industry Association (24 December MKS) which found 
that ROK chip makers are paying 14.2 percent of their sales in 
royalties, compared to 0.5 percent by rival manufacturers in Japan. 
The study attributes the difference to South Korea's "weak" 
technology base, and notes the gap is "acute" in non-memory 
products.  Only 20 percent of South Korea's semiconductor 
manufacturing equipment and 34.6 percent of the materials used to 
manufacture the chips are indigenous, the study reportedly found. 

   Figures for 1993 and 1994 semiconductor sales are reported in the 
16 December MKS as follows. 


                       1993 and 1994 Semiconductor Sales 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 
                    1993                              1994 
          Sales             Exports        Sales            Exports 

Samsung   2.5               ---           3.2 
          ($3.125 billion)  $2.7  billion  ($4 billion)     $3.2 
billion 
Goldstar  0.85              ---            1 trillion plus 
          ($1.06  billion)  $900  million  ($1.25 billion)  $1.2 
billion 
Hyundai   0.75              ---            1.24 
          ($936  million)   $860  million  ($1.55 billion)  $1.47 
billion 

-Total    4.1               ---           5.5 
       ($5.12 billion)     $4.46 billion ($6.87 billion)$5.87billion 


   South Korea's record semiconductor export figure of more than 
$4.46 billion, accounting for 87 percent of its total semiconductor 
sales, came 14 months after a Seoul newspaper had claimed that ROK 
"semiconductor exports are in danger of being completely suspended" 
(23 Oct 92 HANGUK ILBO) because of a provisional U.S. dumping 
charge.  Samsung Electronics, which the 16 December 1993 MKS reports 
made 500 billion won ($625 million) in profits on semiconductor 
sales in 1993--86 percent of which were exports --was alleged to be 
facing a loss in the U.S. market (23 Oct 92 HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN). 
While the ruling was being reconsidered in the United States, most 
Seoul papers ran news stories and editorials describing the 
"catastrophic" effects the dumping margin would have on the 
industry.  At the same time, various "strategies" to reverse the 
ruling were proposed by the newspapers or reported to be under 
consideration, such as "sending high-level officials" for 
discussions with U.S. State, Commerce, and USTR representatives; 
"requesting cooperation" from U.S. companies using South Korean 
semiconductors; and appealing directly to U.S. labor unions and 
consumer groups (23 Oct 92 TONGA ILBO).  A fourth recommendation, 
reported in the 27 October 1992 MKS, to shift resources out of 
semiconductor memory into ASIC's and other high value-added products 
where U.S. import concerns are "weaker" appears, based on recent 
press reports, to have been acted on (see PAFICIC RIM ECONOMIC 
REVIEW Vol 2 No 23 17 Nov 93 pp 26-27). 

   FEATURE:  Intelligence Agency Emphasizing Industrial Espionage -- 
SUMMARY:  South Korea's national intelligence agency is putting 
greater emphasis on the collection of foreign economic and 
technological intelligence, according to a report by its director 
cited in the ROK press.  The move, intended to strengthen South 
Korea's competitiveness in international markets and improve the 
agency's image domestically, reportedly involves hiring more 
specialists in industrial intelligence and increasing the number of 
such agents sent overseas. 

   South Korea's Agency for National Security Planning (NSP), the 
country's national intelligence agency, has made economic 
information gathering its "top priority" this year, the 19 January 
TONGA ILBO reports.  The newspaper cites an address by NSP chief Kim 
Tok to ROK President Kim Yong-sam reportedly stating the agency 
would emphasize collection of economic, industrial, and 
environmental data to help South Korean industries prepare for the 
"coming era of borderless competition." 

   Reporting the same address, YONHAP on 18 January quoted the 
director's statement that "information services for the private 
sector will be increased to make the NSP an intelligence agency in 
which the people have full trust."  President Kim reportedly 
responded by expressing his hope that the NSP would grow into a 
world-level information and intelligence agency." 

   Kim Tok's address follows an earlier report in the 6 May CHUNGANG 
ILBO that the NSP is putting more emphasis on collection of foreign 
technology.  The article noted that despite a hiring freeze, the 
agency intends to hire more S and T experts and "specialists in 
industrial intelligence."  Efforts reportedly were being made to 
attract "professionals" with advanced degrees able to collect and 
evaluate "economic and industrial intelligence."  The paper added 
the NSP also plans to "augment this portion of the personnel it 
sends overseas." 

   FEATURE:  Press View Developments in ROK-Vietnam Trade -- 
SUMMARY:  December marked the first-year anniversary of the 
establishment of diplomatic relations between South Korea and 
Vietnam.  Several articles published that month review recent 
developments in trade and investment between the two nations.  One 
article notes the signing of an arbitration agreement, which would 
help in resolving any trade disputes that may arise as ROK trade and 
investment in Vietnam continue to grow. 

   The 24 December HANGYORE SINMUN reports that South Korea became 
Vietnam's fourth largest trading partner and its third largest 
investor --based on total amount invested--in 1993.  As of 24 
December, ROK exports to Vietnam totaled $652 million, while imports 
totaled $81 million.  This placed Vietnam 11th among nations with 
which the ROK has a trade surplus.  HANGYORE lists the ROK's main 
exports to Vietnam as textile materials, non-metallic mineral 
products, steel, metallic products, chemical industrial goods, 
machinery, and electronics.  The main imports from Vietnam are raw 
materials, such as coal and natural gas, and primary goods, such as 
agricultural products. 

   With regard to investment, HANGYORE notes that the Overseas 
Investment Commercial Center of the Export-Import Bank of Korea 
handled 108 cases of investment in Vietnam over the past year.  This 
was equal to 10.4 percent of all the cases the center handled during 
that period.  While ROK investment in Vietnam has been concentrated 
mainly in light industry, HANGYORE says that there is a trend toward 
diversification into service industries.  As of June, 23 companies- 
-both conglomerates and small and medium businesses (SMB's)--had set 
up 30 branch offices in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  According to 
HANGYORE, KOTRA (the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation) expects 
SMB's to move into export processing zones or set up industrial 
complexes in Vietnam.  It also believes that ROK enterprises will 
have a hand in developing Vietnam's natural resources, such as iron 
ore, natural gas, and copper.  Infrastructure projects may become 
good investment targets as well, according to the article.  Yet 
HANGYORE observes that not all ROK ventures in Vietnam fare well. 
There are cases of businesses failing because they invested without 
having enough advance information about local conditions, of 
friction because of cultural differences, and cases of labor- 
management disputes.  The paper passes along KOTRA's advice that 
firms secure their markets and resources for the long term, and 
increase the legal recognition of Korean products and technology. 

   According to the 22 December HANGUK ILBO (HI), Vietnamese 
authorities expect total trade between the ROK and Vietnam to reach 
$756 million in 1993.  This would be a 53-percent increase over 1992 
trade.  HI reports that as of 22 December, the ROK had received 
approval from Vietnam for 47 investment projects worth a total of 
$2.7 million.  About 40 ROK companies, including major conglomerates 
such as Daewoo, Samsung, Hyundai, and Lucky-Goldstar, have set up 
businesses in Vietnam. 

   In September 1993, KOTRA surveyed some ROK businesses that have 
been active in Vietnam, and HANGYORE SINMUN reports the results of 
the survey in its 24 December issue.  According to the newspaper, 
KOTRA sent surveys to 47 companies who had permission from Vietnam's 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) to invest in 
Vietnam, and received 32 responses.  The responses showed that 25 of 
the firms had invested $5 million or less in their venture; set up 
business primarily in Ho Chi Minh City; and had concentrated on 
investing in textiles or daily necessities.  HANGYORE comments that 
this concentration of business interests could create problems--such 
as "excessive competition"--for ROK enterprises investing in 
Vietnam. 

   ROK firms have already encountered problems when doing business 
in Vietnam, reports the 3 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS). 
Although to date the Korean Commercial Arbitration Board (KCAB) has 
received only one formal complaint from a ROK firm concerning ROK- 
Vietnam trade, the number of business disputes in this area is 
actually higher.  MKS explains that this is because many cases where 
ROK firms have suffered losses in Vietnam are overlooked.  Moreover, 
MKS predicts that the chances of trade disputes will rise as ROK 
business involvement in that country increases.  Currently resolving 
disputes is difficult, particularly because Vietnam does not 
participate in a "New York agreement" --an international arbitration 
agreement.  However, resolving disputes may be easier in the future, 
thanks to an arbitration agreement signed between the Korean 
Commercial Arbitration Board (KCAB) and the Vietnam International 
Arbitration Center in December.  MKS notes that the agreement 
contains the following provisions:  the arbitration panel will be 
drawn from an impartial third country, ROK and Vietnamese 
arbitration bodies will cooperate in developing international 
arbitration, and parties will amicably share information useful to 
both sides. 

       Research Institutes Raise 1994 Growth Rate Estimates -- 
Following slight improvements in the economic climate recently, 
various research institutes have adjusted their estimates for 
economic growth in 1994.  The Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET) raised its 1994 real growth rate estimate 
from 6.1 percent to 6.4 percent.  The Korea Development Institute 
(KDI), which had previously estimated the rate at between 6.5 and 
7.2 percent, has set a new estimate of 7.0 percent.  Other private 
institutes run by conglomerates have also adjusted their estimates 
upward.  The institutes explain that they view prospects for 1994 as 
brighter because much of the "uncertainty" over the real-name 
financial system has been eliminated, and because business 
confidence is being restored following President Kim's speech on 
internationalization.  They expect investment in facilities and 
infrastructure, in particular, to become "vigorous" as companies 
work to improve their competitivenesss.  However, the institutes 
point out that price increases may be a big stumbling block for the 
economy in 1994.  They expect price increases in 1994 to be between 
5 and 6 percent, which is higher than the New Economic Five-Year 
Plan's estimate of a 4.3-percent annual increase. 


          Real    Private     Fixed       Current           Consumer 
Source  Growth  Consumption Investment Account              Prices 
                                              Exports Imports 
Five-year 
plan       7.1      6.5       7.0        0       9.5    7.8    4.3 

Bank of 
Korea      6.3      5.6       6.2        5       7.9    7.8    6.1 

KDI*       7.0      5.7       6.6       14       9.1    7.7    5.6 

KIET*      6.4      6.0       6.8       10       9.1    7.8    5.8 

Samsung*   5.5      5.7       3.6        4       7.4    5.5    5.3 

Lucky- 
Goldstar*  6.8      5.4       6.6       23       8.5    6.6    5.8 

Daewoo*    6.3      5.5       4.9      3.8       7.0    6.0    6.0 

Notes:  Current account unit is $1 billion; all other units are 
percent.  An "*" indicates estimates were recently revised.  Private 
consumption--the five-year plan and Lucky-Goldstar figures indicate 
overall consumption. 

   (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 Dec 93 p 5) 



   Rail Car Orders Expected To Drop 34.5 Percent in 1994 -- Orders 
for electric rail cars manufactured in South Korea are expected to 
fall in 1994.  The three main ROK producers of these cars--Daewoo 
Heavy Industries, Ltd., Hyundai Precision and Industry Co., Ltd., 
and Hanjin Heavy Industries Co., Ltd.--are expected to receive 
domestic orders for 600 rail cars in 1994.  This is 34.5 percent 
less than the 916 cars ordered domestically in 1993.  This is also 
less than the production capacity of the three companies, which was 
raised following a significant increase in both domestic and 
overseas orders in 1993.  Both Daewoo and Hyundai can now produce 
300 cars annually, while Hanjin has a production capacity of 150 
cars.  The companies competed heatedly for domestic orders in 1993, 
often slashing prices to 50-70 percent of cost.  With fewer orders 
being placed, competition among the three is expected to increase, 
even for overseas orders.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 Dec 93 p 
9) 

   ROK To Switch to Metric System for Measuring Rice, Barley -- On 4 
January the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry, and Fisheries 
announced that beginning in 1994, rice and polished barley will be 
measured using the metric weights of kilograms and tons rather than 
the traditional Korean units of sok and kama.  This will be in 
keeping with the era of internationalization and liberalization 
following the Uruguay Round.  According to the ministry, one sok of 
rice will be equivalent to 144 kg, and one kama to 72 kg, while one 
sok of barley will be equivalent to 138 kg, and one kama to 69 kg. 
Thus 1993's rice production--32.98 million sok--equals 4.75 million 
tons, and the government's 1993 rice purchase--lO million sok- 
-equals 1.44 million tons.  Ministry officials note that rice is 
already sold in 10- and 20-kg bags, and that the kama unit was "no 
longer really practical."  (Seoul CHUNGANG ILBO 5 Jan 94 p 3) 

   New Center To Promote Design, Manufacture of ASIC's -- South 
Korea's "Electronic Parts Combined Technology Research Institute" is 
opening a new design center for application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's).  The center will cooperate with private firms to 
determine what ASIC's are in demand.  It will then design the chips, 
develop them, and have them manufactured on domestic production 
lines, including experimental lines operated by Samsung, Goldstar, 
and Hyundai.  The new center "will contribute to the development of 
the domestic electronics industry through core electronics design 
technology, product development, and technological support for small 
and medium businesses (SMB's)."  Its goal is to help SMB's build 
their own ASIC's by supplying technology, equipment, personnel, and 
funds.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Dec 93 p 8) 

   Ministries Funding Development of 256M DRAM -- The Economic 
Planning Board, Ministry of Science and Technology, Ministry of 
Trade, Industry and Energy, and Ministry of Communications are 
jointly supporting an "R and D Group for Basic Technology 
Development of Next-Generation Semiconductors" aimed at "developing 
basic technology associated with high-density semiconductors" at the 
256M DRAM level "or higher" by October 1997.  Some 195.4 billion won 
($244 million) will be spent on the project, including 91.4 billion 
won ($114 million) in state funds.  Huang Ki-ung, director of Seoul 
National University's Semiconductor Research Institute, will lead 
the group, which is co-located with the Semiconductor Research 
Association in Seoul's Yangjae-dong.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 27 Dec 93 p 
23) 

   An earlier report in the 28 August HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN stated 
that the group would be composed of elements from industry, 
academia, and research institutes, and be guided by a Research 
Control Committee which would coordinate views and "allocate support 
burdens."  The Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST) was to provide administrative support. 

   Daewoo To Establish Aviation Technology Research Center in Russia 
-- After a year of preparation, Daewoo Heavy Industry will establish 
an aviation technology research center near Moscow to activate 
cooperation in aviation.  The opening ceremony for the center will 
be held on 30 March.  This is the first time the aviation industry 
will establish a research center to carry out international 
cooperation in aviation technology.  Through the research center, 
Daewoo plans to improve the 28-passenger helicopters--the MI-8 and 
the MI-17--and work to develop the next-generation transport 
helicopter and five-ton class, multipurpose helicopter.  In 
particular, Daewoo plans to use Russia's aviation technology to 
obtain helicopter design technology, engine manufacturing 
technology, and maintenance technology.  The company plans to 
concentrate on working to produce finished helicopter-related 
products.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 Jan 94 p 15) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Euro-Asia Business Center To Be Established in Amsterdam -- In 
May the ROK will establish the Euro-Asia Business Center (EABC) in 
Amsterdam, in cooperation with the Dutch Government.  The EABC will 
serve as a bridgehead for the ROK to advance into the European 
market.  It is to consist of trading firms, companies investing in 
the Netherlands, public organizations, research centers, and travel 
agents.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 19 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Daewoo To Invest in Auto Joint Venture in Romania -- Daewoo Group 
plans to invest $156 million in a joint venture in Romania that will 
manufacture passenger cars for the European market.  Under the 
agreement with Oltcit SA, Daewoo will own 51 percent of the venture. 
The new production lines will manufacture up to 200,000 cars a year 
by 1998.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 
   Kia To Assemble Cars in Pakistan -- Kia Motors recently signed a 
technical cooperation contract with Pakistan's Daur Motors to 
assemble Kia's Pride sub-compact and its one-ton truck models.  This 
will allow Kia to produce 20,000 cars a year in Pakistan through 
local assembly.  Kia will begin shipping parts for the vehicles in 
February.  The company also plans to build a new plant in the Kasim 
industrial complex.  When the plant is completed in 1997, Kia plans 
to increase production to 50,000 vehicles a year.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Hyundai Motors To Manufacture Cars in Egypt -- Hyundai Motors has 
contracted to provide technology and parts for Excel production to 
an Egyptian company.  This company is now building a production 
plant which will produce 10,000 cars a year for Hyundai beginning in 
1996.  Hyundai plans to increase the plant's annual production 
capacity to 50,000 vehicles by the end of 1998.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 13 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Samsung To Build TV Parts Plant in Mexico -- Samsung has decided 
to invest $40 million to build a television parts plant in Tijuana, 
Mexico by 1997.  Construction will start in April.  When completed, 
the plant will produce television tuners, speakers, and other major 
television components.  The plant will supply these parts to Samsung 
Electronics' plant in Mexico, and export them to television 
manufacturing plants in the NAFTA area.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
20 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Halla Group To Export Cement Plant to Papua New Guinea -- HalIa 
Group has received a $142-million order for a cement plant from the 
Papua New Guinea HalIa Cement Company.  The plant will have an 
annual production capacity of 600,000 tons.  HalIa will begin 
construction of the plant in the first half of 1994, and is 
scheduled to complete it in 35 months.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
19 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA -- Minister Comments on Unemployment 
Rate - Manpower Minister Abdul Latief recently commented on 
Indonesia's 38-percent unemployment rate, quoting economists and 
labor experts who believe that the current situation will have 
"serious ramifications" on the future of the country.  These experts 
said that Indonesia runs the risk of having millions of unskilled 
workers, declining international competitiveness, and a rising crime 
rate.  They also stated that economic stagnation would ensue if the 
market for low-cost labor shifts to other countries. 

   Latief noted that the 38-percent figure includes the 29 million 
people who are underemployed.  Likewise, Mari Pangestu, chief 
economist of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, 
pointed out that the official unemployment figure of 2-3 percent is 
"meaningless" because the government derives its unemployment 
figures from the number of people registered as having no jobs and 
seeking employment.  However, few register because Indonesia has no 
social security system.  Pangestu noted that the estimated 2.3-2.5 
million people who enter the job market each year only add to the 
current problems.  (Jakarta SUARA KARYA 13 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Economist Estimates 5.7-Percent Growth for 1994 -- At a recent 
business and financial seminar, Riyanto Sastroatmodjo, an economist 
at the Indonesian Institute of Economic Research, estimated 
Indonesia's 1994 macro-economic growth at about 5.7 percent, down 
from 1993's 6.3-percent figure.  He attributed the decline to a 
downward trend in investments and non-oil/gas exports.  He also said 
that the country's non-oil/gas exports, which reached 26.6 percent 
in 1992 and 10.4 percent in 1993, will most likely reach only 9.3 
percent in 1994-95.  He added that stiff competition from NAFTA, the 
single European market, and overall slow growth will further 
aggravate the situation.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 17 Dec 93 p 4) 

   Habibie Seeking Consortium To Produce 'People's Car' -- The 
Agency for Strategic Industries (BPIS), headed by Research and 
Technology Minister B.J. Habibie, is asking national automobile 
companies to form a consortium to produce a "people's car."  Habibie 
said the idea of producing a "people's car" was approved by 
President Suharto following an agreement last November between BPIS 
and the British Rover Group, a division of British Aerospace.  The 
Rover Group will not only provide technical assistance and 
technology transfer, it will also ship its 1-liter, K- series, 
Rover-I automobile engines to BPIS, according to Habibie.  The 
minister said that all other components for the car will be produced 
locally.  He added that once a "satisfactory" production level has 
been reached, Rover will extend its license to BPIS, thus allowing 
Indonesia to produce automobile engines and to achieve 100-percent 
local content. 

   BPIS is currently designing the "people's car" and expects 
production to start in 1997 or 1998.  The car is to be competitively 
priced, not only for domestic consumption, but also for export in 
the future.  BPIS will probably hold a 30-percent share in the 
consortium, with the remainder going to the national private 
companies.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 7 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Companies Interested in Setting Up Telecommunication Network -- 
Minister of Tourism, Post, and Telecommunication Joop Ave stated 
recently that his ministry has received a request from the Salim 
Group, Prayogo Pangestu, Bimantara, and Timmy Habibie to establish a 
20-million line telecommunication network between 1994 and 1999, 
with a total investment of $10 billion.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 
11 Dec 93 p 1) 

   ADB Approves Loan for Eastern Islands -- The Manila-based Asian 
Development Bank (ADB) has approved a $85-million loan to develop 
urban areas in the eastern part of the country.  The 25-year loan, 
with a grace period of five years, will support urban infrastructure 
development in West Nusa Tenggara, East Nusa Tenggara, East Timor, 
Maluku, and Irian Jaya, which account for nearly one-third of the 
country's land area.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 23 Dec 93 p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  High-Technology Cooperation With Indonesia Planned -- 
Malaysia is working on a high-technology cooperation program with 
Indonesia involving the aerospace and car industries of both 
countries.  Prime Minister Mahathir envisions a bilateral 
cooperation program which would lead Malaysia into manufacturing 
light aircraft, and Indonesia into specializing in larger aircraft 
manufacturing and producing auto components for Malaysia's Proton 
Saga. 

   Mahathir pointed out that there would be a sufficiently large 
market among the ASEAN countries for the aircraft produced by the 
two countries.  He also said that he will discuss in detail the 
manufacturing of Proton Saga components in Indonesia to meet 
Indonesian contents requirements and to reduce import duties. 

   Mahathir had previously announced that Malaysia will start 
producing  three light aircraft in 1994--the Eagle XTS, the basic 
trainer MD3-160, and the Dornier Seas tar CD2.  The Indonesian 
aerospace industry, on the other hand, has had 20 years of 
experience in designing and manufacturing light aircraft.  At a 
recent news conference, Malaysia's Defense Minister Najib Tun Razak 
said Indonesia had agreed in principle to buy 20 MD3-160s and to 
import 1,500 Proton Sagas.  In return, Malaysia would buy an 
undisclosed number of Indonesia's CN-235, a medium-range transport 
carrier with military application capability.  (Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN 
MALAYSIA 23 Dec 93 p 2) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Brownouts in Manila To Continue in 1994 -- 
Brownouts in Manila and other parts of the nation may still occur 
during the coming hot season, according to Representative Dante 
Tinga, chairman of the House Committee on energy.  He said the 
National Power Corporation (Napocor) only has a small supply to take 
care of the needs of industrial and residential areas.  Tinga noted 
that the nation has reserves of approximately 200 mw, while the need 
for electric power may be as high as 500 mw.  At present, brownouts 
in Manila are rare because of the two power barges Napocor recently 
installed in Batangas and Rizal.  However, the mounting operation 
costs of these power barges and the high price of electricity make 
foreign investors "less than eager" to do business in the 
Philippines.  (Manila BALITA 29 Dec 93 p 5) 

   THAILAND:  Government Approves Fijiancial Liberalization for 
Offshore Banking -- The Council of Economic Ministers recently 
approved several measures allowing offshore banking institutions 
under the Bangkok International Banking Facility (BIBF) to establish 
two upcountry branches and to conduct a broader scope of operations, 
including baht lending, foreign exchange transactions, and 
investment banking. 

   Each BIBF bank branch will be permitted to offer baht loans of up 
to 1 billion baht ($40 million) during the early stage, giving local 
Thai financial institutions time to adjust to the growing 
competition. 

   Last year, the Finance Ministry awarded 33 foreign banks and 15 
Thai commercial banks licences to conduct offshore banking as a way 
to liberalize the financial sector and to bolster Thailand as a 
regional financial center, but it restricted BIBF banks to 
Eurodollar transactions only.  The new measure enables BIBF banks to 
take deposits in foreign currencies, and borrow in baht and foreign 
currencies from local and foreign institutions.  BIBF banks will 
also be allowed to deposit baht and foreign currencies at local and 
foreign financial institutions, but their baht deposits must be 
equivalent to their baht lending, not to exceed 1 billion baht per 
branch.  (Bangkok THE NATION 11 Jan 94 p B1) Bangkok Bureaus 

   New Measures To Promote Greater Capital Outflow -- The Council of 
Economic Ministers has approved new measures to promote greater 
capital outflow by allowing each traveller to take out of the 
country up to $20,000 in cash, compared to $10,000 in the past.  The 
$20,000 ceiling on travellers' checks or drafts has been abolished. 

   The relaxation of foreign exchange controls will also allow 
businesses to transfer up to $10 million overseas for investment 
without prior approval, up from $5 million.  In addition, Thai 
companies can now make loans up to $10 million to their overseas 
subsidiaries.  (Bangkok THE NATION 11 Jan 94 pp Al, A2) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   Lower Tariffs Approved for Nonferrous Metal Products, Devices -- 
The Council of Economic Ministers has approved lower tariffs for 220 
non-ferrous metal products, measuring devices, and research 
equipment.  The Finance Ministry said the rates would come under the 
standard structure of six tariffs:  0, 1, 5, 10, 20, and 30 percent. 
The tariffs on 220 non-ferrous metal products that are not locally 
produced will be immediately cut to 5 percent for primary products, 
10 percent for intermediate products, and 20-30 percent for finished 
products. 

   For 55 other products promoted by the Board of Investment or 
those that are locally produced and still need protection, the rates 
will be reduced to the mid-point between the existing levels and 
rates to apply in 1995.  They will be further reduced in 1997.  In 
addition, tariffs on 22 research equipment items and 44 measuring 
devices that cannot be produced locally are immediately reduced. 
The ministry said the changes would cause the government to lose $92 
million in tariff revenue.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 11 Jan 93 p 17) 
Bangkok Bureau/ 

   VIETNAM:  Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in 1993 Listed -- 


Sector                 Projects                Investment Capital 
                                               (in million $) 

Industries             129                     885.4 

Oil, gas               3                       147 

Agriculture, forestry  24                      60.6 

Fishery                2                       0.4 

Post, telegraph, 
transportation         4                       253.2 

Tourism, hotels        31                      577.7 

Services               24                      148 

Banking, finance       4                       45.1 

Construction           3                        22.5 
(residential) 

Others                 8                        28.5 

   (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec p 2) 

Investor Countries in 1993 Reported 

Country                Projects                Investment Capital 
                                               (in million $) 
Hong Kong              27                      562.6 

Taiwan                 38                      355.8 

South Korea            33                      323.7 

Singapore              25                      196.4 

France                 14                      172.4 

Australia              12                      134.6 

Malaysia               10                      121.2 

Thailand               13                      67.8 

Japan                  14                      38.3 

CIS                     5                      11.6 

   The list above does not include 41 projects of unnamed countries, 
with a total investment capital of $184 million.  (Hanoi THOI BAO 
KINH TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec 93 p 2) 



   Auto Assembly Venture With Daewoo Licensed -- South Korea's 
Daewoo and the Union of Machinery Enterprise 7983 (under the Defense 
Ministry's Economic, Technological General Department) have formed a 
30-year joint venture to assemble vans, trucks, and buses.  The 
project was licensed by the State Committee for Cooperation and 
Investment (SCCI) in December and is the fourth auto assembly joint 
venture in the country. 

   Total investment capital in the new venture amounts to $32.2 
million and prescribed capital is $10 million, of which the 
Vietnamese side is  contributing 35 percent.  Future profits will be 
split 65:35 between the two partners.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIETNAM 23-29 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Workers at Foreign-Invested Firms Reportedly Underpaid -- Seventy 
percent of workers at foreign-invested firms in Ho Chi Minh City 
reportedly recive wages lower than the minimum required by the 
Vietnamese Government.  Some 638 enterprises nationwide currently 
take direct investment from foreign countries, and although they 
provide "stable employment" for about 45,000 workers, they "do not 
strictly follow" official labor regulations.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec p 5) 

   Foreign Firms Plan To Manufacture, Assemble Cars in Vietnam -- 
Volkswagen and the Thyssen Steel Company have submitted to the SRV 
Heavy Industry Ministry a plan to manufacture automobiles and auto 
parts in Vietnam.  Once the project is approved, Volkswagen will 
produce 2,000 cars per year on an SKD (semi knock-down) basis and 
eventually switch to a CKD (complete knock-down) basis.  Other 
companies such as Renault and BMW have also expressed interest in 
building assembly plants in Vietnam.  A Mitsubishi project was 
recently approved by the Vietnamese authorities.  Mitsubishi will be 
the second foreign company, after Mekong, to assemble automobiles in 
Vietnam.  (Hanoi LAO DONG 7 Dec 93 p 2) 

   Nguyen Trung Truc, general director of Mercedes-Benz in Vietnam, 
has announced that his company will build a maintenance facility to 
service its cars.  Whenever the Vietnamese market is able to absorb 
500-1,000 vehicles a year, Mercedes will build an assembly plant in 
Vietnam.  Truc said that the Mercedes models produced in Vietnam 
would cost less than elsewhere because of lower expenses for labor 
and service.  The vehicles will be made "to suit the country's 
environment and climate," but the quality will be the "same as in 
Germany."  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM  9-15 Dec 93 p 13) 

   Increase in 1993 Foreign Investments Reported -- In 1993, the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) licensed 282 
investment projects with a total prescribed capital of $2.863 
billion, up 40 percent over the previous year.  Since the 
introduction of the Law on Foreign Investment in 1987, Vietnam has 
granted licenses to 836 projects with a total investment of $7.5 
billion.  The biggest investors are: Taiwan with 117 projects and a 
total capital of $1.53 billion; Hong Kong, 172 projects and $1.30 
billion; and France, 50 projects and nearly $614 million.  (Hanoi 
VNA 1425 GMT 11 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Ship Repair Joint Venture Established -- Ba Son Shipyard and 
Singapore's Keppel Group formed a ship repair, building, and 
technological services joint venture on 13 January.  The new 
venture, called Bason-Keppel Company Ltd., has an investment capital 
of $6.6 million and a legal capital of $4 million, of which Vietnam 
is contributing 40 percent.  (Hanoi VNA 1436 GMT 14 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   Foreign Investment in Dong Nai Province Reported -- Dong Nai 
Province currently has 53 licensed projects worth $520 million.  The 
province's foreign partners are mainly from France, Australia, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, and South Korea.  Dong Nai granted 35 licenses in 
1993 with a total investment capital of $378 million.  It ranks 
fourth in terms of joint ventures with foreign companies, trailing 
Ho Chi Minh City, Hanoi, and Haiphong.  (Hanoi vNA 0609 GMT 18 Jan 
94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Taiwanese, French Firms To Help Build Refinery -- Taiwan Oil 
Company, together with France's Total Company, will help Vietnam 
build a $1.2-billion oil refinery.  Vietnam, Total, and Taiwan Oil 
will each contribute 30 percent, and the Taiwanese China Investment 
Development Corporation will contribute 10 percent.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 2300 GMT 13 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Increase in Ho Chi Minh City Private Sector Output Reported -- 
Private sector industrial establishments in Ho Chi Minh City had a 
gross output value of $607 million in 1993, up 20.4 percent over 
1992, and accounting for 31.3 percent of the city's total industrial 
output.  Last year, about 1,435 private enterprises were licensed to 
operate in the city, raising the number of private businesses and 
companies to 2,208, with a prescribed capital of $154 million.  Some 
989 trading and service companies were in operation in 1993, up from 
34 in 1991, and outnumbering industrial production enterprises. 
(Hanoi VNA 1431 GMT 16 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Hanoi Industrial Sector Marks 22.7-Percent Increase -- In 1993, 
Hanoi's industrial sector registered a turnover of $144 million, a 
22.7-percent increase over the previous year, with city-owned 
industries alone generating a turnover of $51 million or a 31- 
percent increase.  Among those that reported a "high increase" are 
manufacturers  of leather shoes and electrical appliances, and 
producers of rubber, plastic, textile, and garments.  (Hanoi 
Television Network 1215 GMT 9 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Bank of Commerce and Industry Begins New Service -- As of 1 
January, savings account holders in the Bank of Commerce and 
Industry can withdraw money from any branch of the bank.  In 
addition to a credit slip, depositors will receive a bank statement, 
and they will be able to make withdrawals from any branch of the 
bank in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  The minimum amount required for 
opening a savings account is $100, and the maximum one-time 
withdrawal is $1,000.  (Hanoi VNA 0647 GMT 7 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Shipping Firm Signs Contracts With Japan, ROK -- The Hanoi 
Maritime Transport Company (Hamatco), under the Hanoi Transport and 
-Public Works Service, signed several sea transport contracts with 
Japan and South Korea in 1993, totaling $1.85 million.  In order to 
become more competitive, the company plans to purchase new ships in 
the in the future.  (Hanoi VNA 0549 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Construction Begins on Joint Venture Hotel -- Construction of a 
450-room, $74-million five-star hotel in Ho Chi Minh City has 
recently begun.  France's Peal International Company will have a 70- 
percent share in the joint venture and the Tourism Company of Ho Chi 
Minh City, the remainder.  (Hanoi VNA 1328 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   'Cost-and-Freight' Crude Oil Export Noted -- A Japanese tanker 
with about 58,000 tons of crude oil left the White Tiger Oil Field 
off of southern Vietnam for Japan recently, marking the start of 
Vietnamese crude oil export on a "cost-and-freight" basis.  The 
Vietnam Falcon Shipping Company has chartered the 61,000-ton 
Chizukawa for six months to transport about 500,000 tons of crude 
oil for export.  (Hanoi VNA 1333 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Power Supply for Southern Provinces Increases -- The Ministry of 
Energy recently announced that power supply for 20 southern 
provinces and cities will gradually increase in 1994.  The increased 
supply will come from the operation of a new gas turbine generator 
in Ba Ria-Vung Tau with a total capacity of 100 mw.  The supply will 
further increase with the operation of generators at the Thac Mo and 
Vinh Son hydroelectricity stations which are under construction. 
Bui Van Luu, director of Power Company No. 2, said the planned power 
supply for southern provinces and cities in 1994 is about 4.6 
billion kwh, a fourfold increase over 1976, with an average daily 
supply of 15 million kwh, up 20 percent over the 1992-93 dry season. 
The supply is expected to reach 7.2 billion kwh in 1995 and 12.5 
billion kwh in the year 2000.  The power networks of all the 
districts of the 20 southern provinces and cities will be hooked to 
the national power grid in 1994.  (Hanoi VNA 0631 GMT 8 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Three Foreign Investment Projects Approved -- The State Committee 
for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) has granted licenses to three 
foreign projects with a total prescribed capital of $300 million. 
The first project is an automatic textile complex in Dong Nai 
Province with a capital of $242 million invested by Malaysia's 
Hualon Corporation.  The second is a venture between Vietnam and 
Singapore to produce metal boxes in Ho Chi Minh City, capitalized at 
$54 million.  The third is a project with Switzerland's Sika Company 
to establish a 100-percent foreign-invested company in Ho Chi Minh 
CitY to produce construction material, with a capital of more than 
$3.5 million.  (Hanoi VNA 1444 GMT 4 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 
EAG/26JAN94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP./SM 27/1710Z JAN 

